International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
Contents lists available at ScienceDirect
International Review of Financial Analysis
journal homepage: www.elsevier.com/locate/irfa
Artificial intelligence and corporate financialization
Xiaomeng Denga
, Chuan Qin b,
*
a School of Economics and Management, University of Science and Technology Beijing, China
b Rutgers, The State University of New Jersey, NJ, United States
A R T I C L E I N F O
Keywords:
Artificial intelligence
Corporate financialization
Profitability
Financing constraints
Digital transformation
A B S T R A C T
Against the backdrop of deep integration of artificial intelligence (AI) into corporate operations, this study examines
how AI adoption influences firms’ financial asset allocation decisions using panel data of Chinese listed
firms with 30,070 observations covering 2010–2023. Drawing on resource-based theory and corporate finance
perspectives, we find that AI adoption significantly increases firms’ financial asset ratios. This effect operates
through two competing mechanisms: AI enhances profitability, generating surplus funds allocated to financial
assets, while simultaneously alleviating financing constraints, with the profitability channel dominating.
Importantly, this relationship is significantly moderated by three contextual factors: firms’ digital transformation
foundations, top management teams’ technological expertise, and regional digital infrastructure quality. Heterogeneity
analyses reveal that AI’s financial impact is substantially stronger in large firms, digital economy
industries, and competitive markets. These findings contribute theoretically by extending resource-based and
corporate finance perspectives to emerging technologies, demonstrating how AI reshapes corporate resource
allocation through dual pathways contingent on organizational capabilities and environmental conditions.
Practically, firms should strengthen digital capabilities and technological leadership to maximize AI returns,
while policymakers should prioritize digital infrastructure development to amplify AI’s economic benefits.
Future research should examine these relationships across institutional contexts and employ quasi-experimental
designs to strengthen causal inference.
1. Introduction
Artificial intelligence (AI) has emerged as a transformative force
reshaping corporate strategies and resource allocation decisions (Li,
Zhong, & Tong, 2024; Zhang & Yang, 2024; Zhou, Li, Wang, Li, & Zhou,
2025). Companies across industries are increasingly integrating AI
technologies to enhance operational efficiency, strategic decision-
making, and innovation capabilities (Li, Wu, Hu, Pan, & Zhou, 2025).
Recent firm-level evidence demonstrates that investments in AI are
associated with higher growth in sales, employment, and market value,
driven primarily by improved product innovation and operational performance
(Babina, Fedyk, He, & Hodson, 2024; Dong, Xin, Liu, & Yu,
2024). These advancements suggest that AI adoption can strengthen
firms’ competitive advantages and financial outcomes (Qu & Jing, 2025;
Zhang & Piao, 2025). However, an important yet underexplored question
remains: how does AI adoption influence firms’ financial asset
allocation behavior? As firms generate efficiency gains and cost savings
from AI implementation, they face critical strategic decisions about
deploying these benefits, reinvesting in core operations, distributing to
shareholders, or accumulating financial assets. Understanding this
allocation decision has significant implications for firm growth trajectories,
innovation capacity, and broader economic development (Bahoo
et al., 2023; Dai et al., 2025; Zhou et al., 2024; Dai, 2025).
In many economies, firms have exhibited a rising propensity to
allocate resources from core productive activities toward financial investments,
a phenomenon often referred to as “corporate financialization”
(Orhangazi, 2008; Xu & Xuan, 2021). This trend has sparked
considerable debate regarding whether such reallocation supports
corporate stability and flexibility or undermines long-term productive
investment and innovation. Understanding how technological change,
particularly AI adoption, influences this trend carries both theoretical
and practical significance. Existing literature on corporate financialization
identifies multiple drivers explaining why non-financial firms
accumulate financial assets. One perspective suggests that when returns
on real sector investments are low or uncertain, firms seek alternative
revenue streams through financial investments (Demir, 2009). In China,
* Corresponding author.
E-mail addresses: dengxiaomeng@ustb.edu.cn (X. Deng), chuanqin5@outlook.com (C. Qin).
https://doi.org/10.1016/j.irfa.2025.104906
Received 7 July 2025; Received in revised form 11 November 2025; Accepted 4 December 2025
Available online 5 December 2025
1057-5219/© 2025 Elsevier Inc. All rights are reserved, including those for text and data mining, AI training, and similar technologies.
X. Deng and C. Qin this shift from “real” to “virtual” economy activities has been observed
as firms increasingly allocate surplus capital into financial assets amid
industrial overcapacity and economic transitions (Xu & Xuan, 2021).
Another explanation highlights that holding financial assets serves as a
strategic response to financing frictions: firms facing external financing
constraints tend to retain liquidity and short-term investments as precautionary
reserves (Bates, Kahle, & Stulz, 2009). By maintaining
buffers of financial assets, companies ensure funding availability for
future opportunities or economic downturns, thereby alleviating potential
financing constraints (Zhong & Song, 2025). While these motivations
for financialization are well-documented, little is known about
how emerging technologies like AI might fundamentally alter these
dynamics.
From a theoretical standpoint, AI adoption can influence corporate
financialization through two principal mechanisms with potentially
opposing effects. First, AI adoption may substantially improve a firm’s
core profitability and cash flow generation. According to the resource-
based view, technology capabilities serve as valuable firm resources
that enhance productivity and cost efficiency, ultimately boosting
financial performance (Xin, 2025; Durongkadej, Hu, & Wang, 2024).
Empirical studies support this perspective: firms implementing AI report
higher net profit margins and greater operational efficiency (Chen,
Esperança, & Wang, 2022). Improved profitability generates excess cash
or liquid resources, which managers might channel into financial investments
if attractive opportunities in core business operations are
limited. In this sense, AI-driven profit gains might facilitate financialization
by increasing funds available for purchasing financial assets.
Second, AI adoption may significantly affect a firm’s external financing
environment (Wang and Liu, 2025). Innovative adopters of AI could
enjoy better access to financing due to enhanced firm value and investor
confidence, or through policy support favoring technology leaders.
Recent evidence by Zhong and Song (2025) finds that AI adoption in
Chinese firms significantly relieves financing constraints, as measured
by reductions in firms’ reliance on internal funds. When external capital
becomes more accessible or internal cash flows more stable, firms have
less need to hoard precautionary liquid assets. Consequently, easing
financing constraints via AI might mitigate financialization, as companies
can confidently deploy funds in long-term projects rather than
stockpiling financial assets for safety. These two channels suggest a
complex relationship: AI adoption could simultaneously increase
financialization through profitability improvements and decrease it by
relaxing financing constraints.
Given these potentially offsetting effects, the net impact of AI on
corporate financialization becomes a critical empirical question. However,
we propose a positive net relationship based on three considerations
specific to the Chinese economic context. First, during our study
period (2010− 2023), many Chinese industries experienced overcapacity
and declining returns on physical investment (Xu & Xuan,
2021), making firms more likely to retain efficiency gains as financial
assets rather than immediately reinvesting in capacity expansion. Second,
institutional factors including capital market underdevelopment
and property rights concerns create incentives for Chinese firms to hold
liquid, easily-deployable financial assets as strategic flexibility. Third,
while AI may ease financing constraints, this likely unfolds gradually as
firms build track records and reputation, whereas profitability improvements
materialize more quickly, creating a temporal asymmetry
favoring financial asset accumulation in the short-to-medium term
captured by our panel data.
This study aims to fill this research gap by examining whether and
how AI adoption influences the financialization of non-financial firms.
Using a comprehensive panel of Chinese listed companies from 2010 to
2023 with 30,070 observations, we investigate the direct effect of firms’
AI adoption on their financial asset holdings, as well as the mediating
roles of profitability enhancement and financing constraint alleviation
in this relationship. We further consider heterogeneity in this effect by
exploring several moderators related to firms’ digital context: the degree
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
of digital transformation foundation, the top management team’s technology
expertise, and the regional digital infrastructure. These factors
may condition how effectively AI translates into financial outcomes for
firms.
Our research contributes to the literature in several important ways.
First, we bridge the gap between the technology adoption literature and
corporate finance by revealing how AI implementation shapes corporate
asset allocation decisions. While prior studies have linked technology
investments to firm growth and performance (Babina et al., 2024), we
extend this line of inquiry to the domain of financial asset management,
offering evidence on a novel determinant of corporate financialization.
Besides,we employ a longer time series capturing the recent AI boom,
explicitly test dual mediating mechanisms with formal mediation analysis
rather than inferring channels, examine three-level moderating
factors providing a comprehensive contingency framework, and employ
system GMM to address endogeneity concerns more rigorously. Second,
we unpack the mechanisms through which AI influences financialization.
By identifying profitability improvements and reduced financing
constraints as competing mediating pathways, our study sheds light on
why AI-adopting firms might hold different levels of financial assets
compared to non-adopters. This dual-path analysis provides deeper
theoretical understanding of the AI-finance nexus within firms. Third, by
analyzing moderating variables related to digital readiness at firm,
managerial, and regional levels, we highlight the contingent nature of
AI’s impact. This helps pinpoint the conditions under which AI’s influence
on financialization is amplified or dampened, which has practical
implications for managers and policymakers interested in leveraging
digital transformation while maintaining healthy real-financial asset
balances.
The remainder of the paper is organized as follows. Section 2 reviews
relevant literature and theoretical background, culminating in our hypotheses.
Section 3 describes the data, variables, and empirical methodology,
including model specification and diagnostic tests. Section 4
presents the empirical results and robustness checks. Finally, Section 5
discusses the implications, limitations, and future research directions.
2. Literature review and theoretical background
2.1. Corporate Financialization: Concept and drivers
Corporate financialization refers to the increasing allocation of
corporate resources into financial assets or activities by non-financial
firms. It is commonly quantified by the proportion of financial assets
(such as cash, marketable securities, and equity investments) to total
assets on the balance sheet. A growing body of research documents a
rising trend of financialization among non-financial enterprises in both
advanced and emerging economies (Demir, 2009; Orhangazi, 2008).
This trend reflects a strategic shift where firms prioritize financial asset
accumulation and short-term returns, sometimes at the expense of
capital expenditure in their core business operations. Several theoretical
explanations have been proposed for this phenomenon.
One explanation is grounded in the decline of productive investment
opportunities. As returns on traditional industrial projects diminish due
to market saturation or economic slowdown, firms may seek higher
yields or more stable returns in financial markets. Empirical evidence
supports this “substitution” motive: for example, Chinese firms have
increased financial investments in periods of industrial overcapacity and
shrinking profitability of core businesses, effectively shifting from “real”
to “virtual” investments (Xu & Xuan, 2021). In this view, corporate
financialization is a rational response to macroeconomic conditions and
diminishing marginal returns in the real economy.
Another important driver is the presence of financing frictions and
uncertainty. Firms with higher external financing costs or facing credit
constraints often retain liquid assets as a precaution. Holding a buffer of
cash and liquid financial instruments provides insurance against future
shocks and funding needs, consistent with the pecking-order theory that
2
X. Deng and C. Qin firms prefer internal funds for investment. Research shows that companies
with tighter financing constraints exhibit a greater propensity to
accumulate cash and short-term investments (Bates et al., 2009). These
financial assets serve as liquidity reserves that can be tapped when
external capital is costly or unavailable, thereby smoothing investment
and operations. In this light, financialization can be seen as a liquidity
management strategy: it provides firms flexibility and security, albeit
potentially at the cost of forgoing some long-term investment in physical
assets. Recent studies indeed find that alleviating financing constraints
can temper firms’ incentives to hold excess financial assets. For instance,
improved access to bank credit or capital markets is associated with a
reduction in corporate cash holdings and other financial asset ratios.
Thus, the extent of corporate financialization is influenced by a trade-off
between the need for precautionary savings and the opportunities for
productive investment.
Notably, corporate financialization can have mixed implications for
firm performance and the broader economy. On one hand, moderate
levels of financial asset holdings can improve capital allocation efficiency
by allowing firms to dynamically allocate surplus funds and earn
additional income. Such financial investments might also relax future
financing constraints by generating liquid returns. On the other hand,
excessive financialization is often criticized for crowding out real investment
and innovation (Demir, 2009; Orhangazi, 2008). High financial
asset accumulation may indicate that management is prioritizing
short-term financial gains or risk-aversion over long-term growth,
which could dampen the firm’s innovation capacity and economic
growth prospects. For Chinese manufacturing firms, recent evidence
even suggests a non-linear effect: low to moderate financialization can
provide a “reservoir” of funds supporting innovation, but beyond a
threshold it begins to inhibit R&D expenditure, forming an inverted U-
shaped relationship. These findings underscore that the causes and
consequences of financialization are complex and context-dependent.
In summary, the literature indicates two key motivations behind
corporate financialization that are pertinent to our study: (1) a search for
higher returns in the face of declining productive opportunities, and (2)
a response to financing constraints and uncertainty by holding liquid
reserves. The balance between these motives can determine a firm’s
optimal financial asset holdings. We next consider how the adoption of
AI technology might alter this balance, drawing on theoretical perspectives
and emerging empirical insights.
2.2. AI adoption, firm performance, and financing environment
The diffusion of AI and related digital technologies represents a
significant technological shift with potential to impact firm behavior
broadly. The resource-based view (RBV) of the firm provides a useful
framework for understanding how AI capabilities translate into performance
outcomes. According to RBV, firms gain competitive advantage
by developing unique resources and capabilities that are valuable, rare,
and hard to imitate. AI systems, including machine learning algorithms,
intelligent automation, and big data analytics, can be regarded as
advanced organizational capabilities that improve information processing
and operational efficiency. When effectively implemented, AI
enables firms to optimize processes, reduce costs, enhance product
quality, and respond rapidly to market changes. These efficiencies
manifest in improved financial metrics. Empirical evidence is accumulating
that AI adoption boosts firm performance: for example, a recent
large-scale study finds that firms investing in AI experience significant
increases in sales growth and profitability relative to non-adopters
(Babina et al., 2024). Similarly, case studies in sectors like e-commerce
show AI-driven improvements in customer targeting and inventory
management that lead to higher revenue and profit margins
(Chen et al., 2022). In addition to raising the level of performance, AI
may also stabilize it; Lui, Lee, and Ngai (2022) report that firms with
greater AI investment see reduced volatility in sales and earnings,
indicating that AI can make operations more resilient and predictable.
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
Overall, these findings suggest that AI adoption often strengthens a
firm’s financial position, yielding more robust cash flows and profits.
Beyond internal performance, AI adoption can influence a firm’s
external financing conditions. A company at the forefront of AI may be
perceived as more innovative and future-oriented, potentially
improving its valuation and attractiveness to investors and lenders. In
China, government initiatives and capital markets have increasingly
favored high-tech and digitally transforming firms, providing them with
funding advantages such as easier access to equity financing and lower-
cost bank loans. Additionally, firms that successfully deploy AI could
accumulate intellectual assets and data advantages that serve as
collateral or signals of creditworthiness. Recent research highlights a
link between AI adoption and financing constraints: Zhong and Song
(2025) show that Chinese listed companies adopting AI technologies
saw a significant reduction in their financing constraints index (a lower
SA index, per Hadlock & Pierce, 2010). This implies that those firms
either had improved access to external finance or became less dependent
on external funds (e.g. due to stronger internal cash generation), or both.
In another study, Chen, Chu, and Zhao (2024) find that AI-adopting
firms in China increased their risk-taking in investment and strategy,
with the effect being more pronounced for firms facing lower financing
constraints, suggesting that access to finance complements the risk-
mitigating benefits of AI. These pieces of evidence align with the
notion that AI can alter the financial ecosystem of the firm: by boosting
profitability and investor confidence, AI adopters may find it easier to
raise capital and thus operate with less financial stress.
It is important to recognize that implementing AI often requires
substantial upfront investment in software, hardware, and talent. Firms
with limited financial slack or financing options might struggle to adopt
AI at scale. Therefore, there could be a selection effect where firms that
are already financially stronger (or less constrained) are more likely to
invest in AI. Our analysis will account for this by controlling for firm
size, leverage, and other factors, as well as using fixed-effects to mitigate
time-invariant differences. Assuming AI adoption can be treated as at
least partially exogenous or instrumented by certain drivers (though a
full treatment of endogeneity is beyond the scope of this section), its
subsequent effects on firm financial behavior remain an open question.
2.3. Linking AI adoption to corporate Financialization
Integrating the above discussions, we propose that AI adoption has a
significant impact on corporate financialization through its effects on
profitability and financing constraints. First, consider the profitability
channel. A firm that achieves higher profits and cash flow from AI-
driven improvements has more discretionary resources at hand. Managers
then face decisions on how to utilize these funds. If the firm has
abundant profitable investment opportunities (for instance, further
expansion, R&D, or capacity building), one would expect it to reinvest
the cash into the business, which could reduce the relative share of
financial assets (since total assets grow via real investment). However, if
the firm’s growth opportunities are limited or if managers are risk-
averse, they might allocate a significant portion of the surplus funds
into financial assets. Holding financial assets can generate passive income
and offer flexibility for future investments. In many large companies,
substantial profits are often parked in short-term investments or
cash equivalents before deployment (Bates et al., 2009). Thus, higher
profitability could lead to higher financial asset ratios if immediate
reinvestment needs are met or if management prefers the liquidity and
lower risk of financial investments. In the context of AI adopters, if these
firms enjoy profit windfalls from efficiency gains, a part of those
windfalls may flow into financial portfolios (time deposits, bonds, equity
stakes, etc.), thereby increasing corporate financialization. This is
sometimes referred to as the “reservoir effect,” where excess capital is
stored in financial form. On the other hand, we acknowledge the possibility
that some AI-driven firms, especially those oriented toward
innovation, might aggressively reinvest profits into new projects (e.g.
3
X. Deng and C. Qin developing more AI capabilities), which would counteract financialization.
The net effect of profitability on financial asset holding is
therefore empirical, but we lean on the precautionary and reservoir
motive literature to expect a positive link in aggregate.
Second, the financing constraint channel likely works in the opposite
direction. When AI adoption eases a firm’s financing constraints, the
firm no longer needs to retain as much liquid wealth for precautionary
motives. In other words, if a company knows it can raise debt or equity
capital relatively easily when needed (because it has proven AI strengths
and investor backing), it might choose to deploy its cash more confidently,
rather than keeping it idle in low-yield financial instruments.
This scenario would result in lower levels of financial asset holdings than
otherwise, as funds are redirected to productive uses or returned to
shareholders. Empirical evidence suggests that firms with improved
financing access reduce their cash ratios and financial investments. In
our case, AI-adopting firms that become less financially constrained
might draw down previously accumulated cash reserves or be less inclined
to build them up, thus dampening financialization. Additionally,
if AI adoption reduces earnings volatility (Lui et al., 2022; Yang, 2025),
firms may perceive less need for precautionary liquidity, further
reducing the motive to hold financial assets. Therefore, the financing
constraint relief brought by AI is expected to have a negative influence
on corporate financialization.
In summary, theory and prior findings indicate two countervailing
mechanisms: (a) AI adoption → higher profitability → higher financialization,
and (b) AI adoption → lower constraints → lower financialization.
The overall impact of AI on a firm’s financial asset ratio will
depend on the relative strength of these mechanisms. It is conceivable
that the profitability effect dominates in some contexts (leading to a net
positive effect on financialization), or conversely, the reduction in precautionary
needs dominates (leading to a net negative effect). This
nuanced outcome is an empirical matter that our study will resolve.
Beyond these average effects, we also expect heterogeneity based on
firm and regional characteristics, which we outline in our hypotheses
below.
2.4. Hypotheses development
AI Adoption and Corporate Financialization. Given the discussion
above, we first posit a direct relationship between AI implementation
and the degree of corporate financialization. Firms that actively adopt AI
technologies are likely to undergo changes in their financial profiles. On
one side, efficiency gains and cost reductions from AI can increase
profitability and generate surplus cash, part of which might be invested
in financial assets if not immediately needed for expansion. On the other
side, the improved credit standing and reduced uncertainty associated
with AI adoption can lessen the need to hold precautionary financial
buffers. Which effect prevails is ambiguous a priori. However, considering
the context of many publicly listed firms that face pressures to
show returns on idle cash, it is plausible that a significant portion of the
gains from AI adoption is temporarily placed into financial investments,
at least until compelling strategic uses arise. Indeed, early research
suggests that the application of AI technology tends to enhance the level
of financialization in enterprises (Chen et al., 2023). We thus propose
our first hypothesis:
H1. Ceteris paribus, a higher level of AI adoption in a firm is associated
with a higher degree of corporate financialization (financial assets as a
proportion of total assets).
Mediating Role of Profitability Improvement. AI-driven improvements
in firm profitability are expected to be a key mediator in the
AI–financialization relationship. As argued, AI adoption can raise net
profit margins by increasing revenue and reducing operating costs. This
improved profitability (measured, for example, by net profit to sales)
increases the pool of internal funds available to management. According
to the free cash flow theory, excess internal funds can sometimes lead to
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
suboptimal uses if not disciplined, one such use can be accumulating
financial investments or cash beyond what is needed. Even absent
agency problems, prudent management may choose to hold a portion of
newfound profits in liquid form to maintain flexibility. Therefore, we
expect that AI adoption contributes to higher financial asset holdings
partly through its positive impact on profitability. Formally:
H2. The positive effect of AI adoption on corporate financialization is
mediated by an improvement in firm profitability. (AI adoption →
higher profitability → higher financialization.)
Mediating Role of Financing Constraint Alleviation. The second
mediating mechanism relates to the firm’s financing constraints. As
discussed, firms adopting AI may experience relaxed financing frictions
due to better performance signals and greater investor confidence
(Zhong & Song, 2025). We measure financing constraints via the SA
index (size-age index from Hadlock & Pierce, 2010), where a lower
value indicates easier access to finance. AI adoption is hypothesized to
reduce this index. When financing constraints are alleviated, the firm’s
reliance on self-financing and precautionary cash is reduced, which
should logically lead to a decrease in financial asset holdings relative to
total assets. This is because the firm can deploy funds more freely into
long-term investments or pay them out, knowing that external finance is
attainable if needed. We thus expect a negative mediation effect through
financing constraints:
H3. AI adoption alleviates firms’ financing constraints, which in turn
reduces the level of corporate financialization. (AI adoption → lower
financing constraints → lower financialization.)
It should be noted that H2 and H3 describe two competing pathways.
In our empirical analysis, we will test the significance of each mediation
path to understand their relative magnitudes. It is possible that both
operate simultaneously, partially offsetting each other. For instance, AI
might increase financialization through profitability (supporting H2)
while also decreasing it through lowered constraints (supporting H3). A
finding that H2 dominates would align with an overall positive effect of
AI on financialization (consistent with H1), whereas a stronger H3 could
dampen or even overturn the direct effect.
Moderating Role of Digital Transformation Foundation. Not all firms
benefit equally from AI adoption; the existing digital infrastructure and
capabilities of a firm can moderate the outcomes. We define a firm’s
digital transformation foundation (DIG) as the proportion of intangible
assets related to digital technology (software, data platforms, etc.) in its
total intangible assets. A higher DIG indicates that the firm has already
invested in digital resources and is more digitally mature. Such a
foundation likely complements AI implementation – a digitally mature
firm can integrate AI tools more effectively into its operations, yielding
greater performance improvements. Consequently, we expect that in
firms with a strong digital foundation, the effects of AI adoption (on
profitability and on easing finance frictions) are amplified. This means
the eventual impact on financialization could also be stronger. If H1
holds (AI increases financialization), a strong digital base would
magnify that increase by enabling AI to generate even more surplus
funds or returns. Alternatively, if AI mainly reduces precautionary motives,
a strong digital base might amplify that reduction. In either case,
the interaction is expected to be significant. We hypothesize:
H4. The firm’s digital transformation foundation positively moderates
the effect of AI adoption on corporate financialization. The influence of
AI on financialization is stronger for firms with greater digital intangible
asset bases.
Moderating Role of Top Management Team’s Technology Cognition.
Effective adoption of AI often requires visionary leadership and understanding
at the top management level. We consider the technology
cognition of the top management team (TMTECH) as an ordinal indicator
of digital expertise among executives. A higher TMTECH score
(where, for example, 3 indicates a CEO or Chair with tech background)
4
X. Deng and C. Qin signals that leadership is technologically savvy. Such leaders are more
likely to successfully implement AI initiatives and also to strategically
manage the resulting financial outcomes. A tech-oriented management
might, for instance, be more inclined to reinvest AI-generated earnings
into further tech innovation rather than purely financial investments, or
vice versa, they might better recognize lucrative fintech opportunities
for excess cash. Overall, we posit that management’s tech cognition will
intensify the impact (directionally) of AI on financialization. If AI tends
to increase financialization, tech-savvy managers will enable an even
greater increase by fully capitalizing on AI-related financial gains.
Conversely, they might also make more efficient use of slack, possibly
tempering pure financial hoarding. On balance, we expect an enhancing
effect on whatever direction AI pushes financialization. Formally:
H5. The positive relationship between AI adoption and corporate
financialization (H1) is stronger when the top management team has
higher technology cognition. In other words, firms led by tech-savvy
management exhibit a more pronounced change in financial asset
holdings in response to AI adoption.
Moderating Role of Regional Digital Infrastructure. Finally, the
broader environment in which a firm operates can shape the returns to
its AI investments. We consider the regional digital infrastructure (INF),
measured by the emphasis on new digital infrastructure in the local
government’s reports (frequency of keywords indicating digital infrastructure
development). Regions with better digital infrastructure (such
as widespread high-speed internet, data centers, 5G networks, smart city
initiatives) provide a supportive context for companies to implement AI
solutions effectively. In such regions, AI adoption by firms is likely to
yield greater performance benefits due to external spillovers and
network effects (e.g., availability of skilled workforce, suppliers, and
complementary services). This should again magnify the impact of AI on
firm financial outcomes. We hypothesize a similar moderating effect at
the regional level:
H6. The effect of AI adoption on corporate financialization is more
pronounced for firms located in regions with more advanced digital
infrastructure. A conducive digital environment strengthens the link
between AI implementation and firms’ financial asset allocation
changes.
By testing H4, H5, and H6, we aim to paint a clearer picture of the
contexts under which AI adoption most strongly affects financialization.
These moderators will be examined through interaction terms in our
regression models, as described in the methodology.
3. Methodology
3.1. Data and sample
We construct a panel dataset of Chinese A-share listed non-financial
companies from 2010 to 2023 to empirically test the above hypotheses.
The initial sample is drawn from financial statement data and supplemental
disclosures available in the China Stock Market & Accounting
Research (CSMAR) and China Research Data Services (CNRDS) databases.
We focus on the 2010–2023 period, during which AI-related investments
by firms became increasingly prevalent and detailed data on
such investments can be obtained from annual report notes. The sample
consists of 4719 firms and a total of 30,070 firm-year observations after
applying the following filtering criteria for data reliability and
consistency:
•We exclude firms with special treatment status (ST, *ST) or particular
transfer (PT) status, as these companies are under financial
distress or restructuring, which could skew their financial asset
holdings and technology investment behavior.
•We exclude firms in the financial industry (such as banks, insurers,
securities companies) because their asset structures and regulatory
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
environments are entirely different (financial assets are part of core
operations for them, not an indicator of “financialization” in the
same sense).
•We drop any firm-year observations with missing values for key
variables used in our analysis (AI investment measures, financial
assets, control variables, etc.), ensuring a balanced panel where
possible.
•All continuous variables are winsorized at the 1 % level at both tails
to mitigate the influence of outliers. This standard procedure prevents
extreme values from unduly affecting the regression results,
particularly pertinent given the skewness often observed in financial
ratios.
•For our main independent variable (AI adoption level), we apply a
data transformation to address high skewness and heteroscedasticity.
Specifically, because the AI adoption proxy (explained below) exhibits
a large standard deviation across firms, we add 1 to the raw
measure, take the natural logarithm, and then divide by 10. This log-
scaling smooths extreme differences and helps linearize the relationship
without altering the ordinal information (a similar approach
is taken in prior literature where investment variables are highly
skewed).
After these preprocessing steps, our final sample is a panel well-
suited for fixed-effects regression analysis. The panel structure allows
us to control for unobserved firm-specific factors (via firm fixed effects)
and for macroeconomic or systemic shocks common to all firms in a
given year (via year fixed effects). By leveraging within-firm variation
over time, we aim to isolate the impact of changes in AI adoption on
changes in financialization, while holding constant time-invariant firm
characteristics.
3.2. Variable definitions and measurement
Corporate Financialization (FIN). The dependent variable is the
degree of corporate financialization, denoted as FIN, measured as the
proportion of a firm’s financial assets to its total assets. Financial assets
are defined to include cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments
in securities (stocks, bonds, wealth management products), other receivable
investments, and any other financial asset items reported on the
balance sheet. This ratio captures the extent to which a firm’s assets are
tied up in financial forms as opposed to real economy assets (like inventory,
fixed assets, etc.). A higher FIN indicates a greater orientation
toward financial holdings. In robustness checks, we also construct an
alternative measure FIN_dum, a dummy variable equal to 1 if the firm
holds any significant financial assets (e.g., non-zero holdings in particular
categories like trading securities or wealth management products)
and 0 otherwise. While most listed firms do hold some financial assets,
this dummy is more relevant when focusing on the extensive margin of
financialization (whether to financialize or not). Our main analysis,
however, concentrates on the continuous ratio FIN.
AI Adoption (AI). The primary independent variable is the firm’s AI
adoption level (AI). Following recent literature in the Chinese context,
we proxy AI adoption by a firm using information from annual report
notes about investments in intelligent machinery and equipment. Specifically,
we take the total value of purchases of machinery and equipment
related to automation or AI (as disclosed in the fixed asset notes)
and scale it by the number of employees. This per-employee machinery
investment serves as a proxy for the intensity of AI and automation
technology adoption in the firm’s operations. The data for this is gathered
via text analysis of financial statement footnotes, using keywords to
identify AI-related equipment (e.g., industrial robots, smart
manufacturing systems). The ratio is then log-transformed (log(1 +
value/employee)/10) as noted above. A larger value of AI indicates a
higher degree of AI integration in the firm relative to its labor size,
reflecting more extensive adoption of AI tools and machinery. We
acknowledge that this is an indirect measure – it captures automation
5
X. Deng and C. Qin capital deepening, which correlates with AI use – but it has been used in
prior studies and leverages the only available firm-level data on AI investment
in our context.
To ensure robustness, we introduce an alternative independent variable
AI_replace, representing the firm’s AI investment level based on
both software and hardware related to AI. The construction of AI_replace
is as follows: we parse the notes to financial statements for mentions of
intangible assets related to digital and intelligent technologies (keywords
including “software”
,
“intelligent system”
,
“information platform”
,
“cloud computing”
,
“big data”
“AI”
,
,
“internet of things”
, etc.) to
capture AI-related intangible asset investment. Similarly, we scan for AI-
related fixed asset investments (keywords like “computer equipment”
,
“electronic device”
,
“automation equipment”
“server”
“smart termi,
,
nal”
“data center”
,
,
“chip”
, etc.). Summing these two components gives
the total AI-related investment in assets. We then scale this by total
assets to obtain AI_replace, the ratio of AI-specific assets to total assets.
This alternative measure captures a broader range of AI expenditures
(both tangible and intangible) and is expressed as a percentage of total
assets. It serves as a proxy for the firm’s commitment to AI technology in
its asset structure. We will use AI_replace in supplementary analyses to
check if our results are consistent under this definition.
Mediators: We examine two mediating variables. The first is Profitability
Improvement (NetProfit), measured as the net profit divided by
operating revenue (net profit margin). This captures the firm’s profit
efficiency – how much profit is generated per unit of sales – and reflects
improvements in cost management or value addition potentially
brought by AI. We denote this ratio by NetProfit and expect AI adoption
to increase it. The second mediator is Financing Constraint (FC). To
measure a firm’s financing constraints, we use the SA index developed
by Hadlock and Pierce (2010). This index is constructed as:
SA=− 0.737 ×Size +0.043 ×Size2
− 0.040 ×Age,
where Size is the natural log of total assets (in 2009 RMB millions) and
Age is the firm’s age (years since establishment). The SA index is a
parsimonious measure where higher values indicate greater financial
constraint (typically smaller, younger firms). We compute this index for
each firm-year and use it as our FC variable. A reduction in FC (a lower
SA value) implies an alleviation of financing constraints. Notably, this
measure relies only on exogenous or slow-moving firm traits (size and
age) and avoids direct inclusion of potentially endogenous financial
variables, making it suitable for avoiding certain endogeneity concerns
(Hadlock & Pierce, 2010). We expect AI adoption to correlate with a
decrease in FC, reflecting easier financing.
Moderators: Three moderator variables are considered, each interacting
with AI adoption in the models. Digital Transformation Foundation
(DIG) is measured as the proportion of intangible assets related to
digital technology to total intangible assets. From firms’ annual reports,
we identify the year-end carrying value of intangible assets that are
digital in nature (such as software platforms, proprietary information
systems, databases, etc.) and divide it by total intangible assets. This
ratio, denoted DIG, indicates how much of the firm’s intangible capital is
invested in digital technology, serving as a proxy for the firm’s baseline
digital capability. Top Management Team’s Technology Cognition
(TMTECH) is an index reflecting the presence of tech expertise in the top
management team (TMT). We code TMTECH on a scale of 0 to 3: a value
of 0 if the firm has no senior executives with a background in digital
technology, 1 if at least one TMT member has tech experience or education,
2 if such a tech-experienced member also sits on the board of
directors, and 3 if the firm’s CEO or board chair themselves has a strong
digital tech background (making them a “digital leader”). This ordinal
variable TMTECH captures increasing levels of technological orientation
in leadership. Finally, Regional Digital Infrastructure (INF) measures the
external digital environment. For each firm-year, we proxy INF by
analyzing the city-level government work report for the frequency of
terms related to “new digital infrastructure” (e.g., mentions of data
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
centers, 5G, IoT infrastructure, smart city projects) divided by the total
words in the report. This yields a percentage indicating the emphasis on
digital infrastructure in the region’s policy agenda. A higher INF suggests
the region has more developed digital infrastructure and focus,
which likely benefits firms implementing AI.
Control Variables: We incorporate a set of control variables that
might also influence corporate financialization, based on prior literature.
All controls are from the same financial dataset and are defined as
follows. Return on Equity (ROE), measured as net profit divided by the
average shareholders’ equity, controls for profitability from the owners’
perspective (distinct from the profit margin mediator). Higher ROE
could either reduce financialization (if profits are reinvested or paid out)
or increase it (if retained as cash). Current Ratio (Liquid) is the ratio of
current assets to current liabilities, included to control for liquidity
needs and working capital management. Firms with higher liquidity
may hold more financial current assets. Financial Leverage (FL) is
calculated as EBIT
EBT where EBIT is earnings before interest and taxes (net
profit +interest +taxes) and EBT is earnings before taxes (net profit +
taxes). This ratio essentially captures the impact of interest expenses on
earnings; a higher value indicates higher leverage (if interest is significant,
EBIT/EBT >1). We control for FL because leverage can affect both
the ability to invest in AI and the need to hold financial assets (highly
leveraged firms might hold more cash as a buffer, or less if creditors
impose restrictions). Board Independence (Indep) is measured as the
number of independent directors divided by the total number of directors
on the board. We include this to account for corporate governance
quality, as boards with greater independence may exercise more
prudent financial oversight, potentially affecting financial asset policies.
Finally, Institutional Ownership (INST) is the proportion of shares held
by institutional investors. Higher institutional ownership could pressure
management either to deploy cash efficiently (reducing idle financial
asset holdings) or could tolerate financial investments if seen as prudent.
These control variables are included as standard determinants to isolate
the effect of AI and ensure our results are not confounded by these
factors. All variables with their descriptions, abbreviations, and data
sources are summarized in Table 1 below:
3.3. Model specification
We employ panel regression models with firm fixed effects and year
fixed effects to test our hypotheses. The baseline model examines the
direct impact of AI adoption on corporate financialization (H1). We
specify the baseline estimation equation as follows:
FINit =α0 +α1AIit +α
ʹControlsit +μi +λt +εit
Where:
•FINit: Corporate financialization (financial assets proportion) of firm
i in year t.
•AIit: Artificial Intelligence adoption level of firm i in year t.
•Controlsit: Vector of control variables (ROE, Liquid, FL, Indep, INST).
•μi: Firm fixed effects.
•λt: Year fixed effects.
•εit: Firm-level clustered error term.
Next, to test the mediation effects (H2 and H3), we follow Baron and
Kenny’s approach and use structural equations. Specifically, we estimate
two first-stage models for the mediators and then a second-stage model
for FIN including the mediators:
Mediation Path 1 (Profitability - H2):
First stage: Impact of AI on Profitability
NetProfitit =β0 +β1AIit +βʹControlsit +μi +λt +ηit
Second stage: Impact of AI and Profitability on Financialization
FINit =δ0 +δ1AIit +δ2NetProfitit +δʹControlsit +μi +λt +εit
6
X. Deng and C. Qin International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
Table 1
Definitions of variables and data sources.
Variable (Abbreviation) Category Measurement Data Source
Corporate Financialization
Dependent
(FIN)
Variable Ratio of financial assets to total assets (financial asset proportion) Annual balance sheet (CSMAR)
Financialization Dummy
(FIN_dum) Dependent (Alt.) Dummy equal to 1 if firm holds any significant financial assets, 0 otherwise Annual reports (indicator from
CSMAR)
AI Adoption Level (AI) Independent
AI adoption intensity: (Value of AI-related machinery & equipment purchases / Number of
Annual report notes (CNRDS,
Variable
employees), log-transformed (ln(1 +x)/10)
keyword-based)
AI Investment Level
Independent
Annual report notes (CNRDS,
(AI_replace)
(Alt.) Ratio of AI-related intangible +tangible assets to total assets
keyword-based)
Profitability (NetProfit) Mediator 1 Net profit / Operating revenue (net profit margin) Income statement (CSMAR)
Financing Constraint (FC) Mediator 2 SA index =− 0.737Size +0.043Size^2–0.040*Age (higher =more constrained) Computed from firm size, age
(CSMAR)
Digital Foundation (DIG) Moderator 1 Digital intangible assets / Total intangible assets (proportion of intangibles in digital tech) Annual report notes (CNRDS)
TMT Tech Cognition
(TMTECH) Moderator 2 Index 0–3 reflecting tech background of top management team (higher =more tech-savvy
Company biographies, resumes
leadership)
(Wind/CSMAR)
Regional Digital
Infrastructure (INF) Moderator 3 Frequency of “digital infrastructure” keywords in city government work report / Total
Government reports (provincial
words (percentage)
yearbooks)
Return on Equity (ROE) Control Net profit / Average shareholders’ equity (annual ROE, %) Annual financial statements
(CSMAR)
Current Ratio (Liquid) Control Current assets / Current liabilities (liquidity ratio) Annual financial statements
(CSMAR)
Financial Leverage (FL) Control Leverage ratio =(Net profit +Tax +Interest) / (Net profit +Tax) =EBIT / EBT Computed from income
statement (CSMAR)
Board Independence (Indep) Control Number of independent directors / Board size Corporate governance filings
(CSMAR)
Institutional Ownership
(INST) Control Shares held by institutional investors / Total shares (% ownership) Shareholder records (CSMAR)
Mediation Path 2 (Financing Constraints - H3):
First stage: Impact of AI on Financing Constraints (SA index)
FCit =γ0 +γ1AIit +γʹControlsit +μi +λt +υit
Second stage: Impact of AI and Financing Constraints on Financialization
FINit =δ0 +δ1AIit +δ3FCit +δʹControlsit +μi +λt +εit
To test the moderation hypotheses (H4, H5, H6), we extend the
baseline model to include interaction terms. For example, to test H4 with
moderator DIG, we estimate:
Moderation by Digital Foundation (H4):
FINit =α0 +α1AIit +α2DIGit +α3(AIit ×DIGit)+α
ʹControlsit +μi +λt +εit
Moderation by TMT Tech Cognition (H5):
FINit =α0 +α1AIit +α2TMTECHit +α3(AIit ×TMTECHit)+α
ʹControlsit
+μi +λt +εit
Moderation by Regional Digital Infrastructure (H6):
FINit =α0 +α1AIit +α2INFit +α3(AIit ×INFit)+α
ʹControlsit +μi +λt +εit
All models are estimated using Ordinary Least Squares (OLS) with
fixed effects. We conducted a series of model specification tests to ensure
that a fixed-effects approach is warranted over alternatives like random-
effects or pooled OLS. Table 2 presents the results of three key tests: an F-
test for the presence of firm fixed effects, a Breusch-Pagan Lagrange
Multiplier (LM) test for random effects, and a Hausman test comparing
fixed vs. random effects estimates.
As shown in Table 2, the F-test strongly rejects the null hypothesis
Table 2
Model specification tests for panel effect.
Test Statistic p-value
F-test (fixed effects vs. pooled OLS) 8.85 0.0000***
Lagrange Multiplier (random effects vs. OLS) 17,205.28 0.0000***
Hausman (fixed vs. random effects) 332.80 0.0000***
that all firm fixed effects are zero (p < 0.001), indicating significant
unobserved heterogeneity across firms that is correlated with the regressors.
The LM test likewise is highly significant, favoring a panel
model over simple OLS. The critical Hausman test yields a chi-square
statistic of 332.80 (p < 0.001), rejecting the null that random effects
estimates are consistent – in other words, confirming that the firm effects
are correlated with the independent variables, and therefore a
fixed-effects model is appropriate. Based on these tests, we proceed with
two-way fixed effects (firm and year) in all regressions to obtain unbiased
estimates. With the methodology established, we now turn to the
empirical results, where we present the estimated effects of AI adoption
on corporate financialization and examine the support for each of our
hypotheses.
4. Empirical results and discussion
4.1. Descriptive statistics and correlation analysis
Table 3 presents summary statistics for all variables. The average
value of the financial outcome variable (FIN) is about 0.049 with a
relatively wide range (0 to 0.448), indicating substantial variation
across firms. The mean of AI adoption (lnAI) is 0.886 (approximately
2.43 in non-log terms), suggesting that on average firms have a moderate
level of AI input, though some have zero AI investment. Firm
profitability (ROE) averages about 9.8 %, and liquidity has a mean of
2.817, implying that many firms hold liquid assets roughly 2.8 times
their current liabilities on average. Other governance and financial
structure indicators, such as financial leverage (FL) and board
Table 3
Descriptive statistics.
Variable N Mean p50 SD Min Max
FIN 30,070 0.0490 0.0110 0.0840 0 0.448
lnAI 30,070 0.886 1.093 0.478 0 1.464
ROE 30,070 0.0980 0.0860 0.0690 0.00300 0.351
Liquid 30,070 2.817 1.862 2.833 0.385 17.32
FL 30,070 1.287 1.047 0.853 0.407 6.741
Indep 30,070 0.375 0.357 0.0520 0.333 0.571
INST 30,070 0.436 0.453 0.254 0.00300 0.908
7
X. Deng and C. Qin independence (Indep), show reasonable dispersion with values consistent
with typical corporate settings (mean FL ~1.29, meaning debt
slightly exceeds equity on average, and mean board independence
~37.5 %). Overall, these descriptive statistics suggest a diverse sample
in terms of AI usage and financial conditions, which is suitable for
examining how AI relates to financial performance.
Table 4 reports the correlation matrix. Most pairwise correlations are
statistically significant given the large sample size, though many coefficients
are small in magnitude. Notably, FIN is positively correlated
with liquidity (r =0.187, p <0.01) and board independence (r =0.057,
p < 0.01), and negatively correlated with financial leverage (r =
− 0.095, p <0.01). This pattern is intuitive: firms with greater liquidity
and more independent boards tend to have better financial outcomes,
while higher leverage is associated with weaker financial positions.
Interestingly, the simple correlation between AI adoption (lnAI) and FIN
is slightly negative (r =− 0.021, p < 0.01), suggesting that firms with
higher AI investment tend to have marginally lower raw FIN values.
However, this bivariate relationship is very weak and does not account
for other factors. In fact, as the regression results will show, the relationship
turns positive after controlling for firm characteristics, indicating
that the slight negative correlation may be driven by underlying
differences in firm size, industry, or other variables. The control variables
exhibit expected correlations among themselves: for example,
firms with higher leverage have lower liquidity (r =− 0.242, p <0.01)
and lower ROE (r =− 0.298, p < 0.01), consistent with the trade-off
between debt and performance. Overall, multicollinearity does not
appear to be a concern at the bivariate level, as most correlations are
well below 0.5 in absolute value.
4.2. Multicollinearity diagnostics
Before proceeding to regression analysis, we conduct multicollinearity
diagnostics to ensure the reliability of our coefficient estimates.
Table 5 reports Variance Inflation Factor (VIF) values for all
independent variables included in our models. The VIF quantifies how
much the variance of an estimated regression coefficient increases due to
collinearity, with values exceeding 10 typically indicating problematic
multicollinearity that may inflate standard errors and destabilize coefficient
estimates. Table 5 provides Variance Inflation Factor (VIF) values
for the independent variables. All VIFs are close to 1, with the highest
being only 1.17 for financial leverage. The mean VIF is 1.08, indicating
that multicollinearity is minimal. These diagnostics confirm that our
regression models are unlikely to suffer from multicollinearity problems.
In other words, the explanatory variables (AI adoption and controls like
ROE, liquidity, leverage, board independence, and institutional ownership)
are sufficiently independent of one another, and each provides
unique information in the regression analysis. The low VIF for lnAI
(approximately 1.01) is especially reassuring, as it shows that the AI
variable is not linearly dependent on other covariates such as firm size or
profitability.
These diagnostics provide strong confidence that our regression
models will not suffer from multicollinearity problems. The coefficient
estimates and standard errors can be interpreted with assurance that
they reflect genuine relationships rather than statistical artifacts of
Table 4
Correlation matrix.
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
Table 5
VIF test.
Variable VIF 1/VIF
FL 1.170 0.853
ROE 1.130 0.886
Liquid 1.100 0.912
INST 1.060 0.946
lnAI 1.010 0.989
Indep 1.010 0.994
Mean VIF 1.080
collinearity among predictors. This foundation allows us to proceed to
hypothesis testing with confidence in the reliability and interpretability
of our regression results. Therefore, we can interpret the regression
coefficients with confidence that they reflect genuine relationships
rather than statistical artifacts of collinearity.
4.3. Baseline regression results
Table 6 (baseline regression) examines the impact of AI adoption on
firms’ financial outcomes. Across models (1) through (6), the coefficient
on AI (lnAI) is positive and statistically significant, supporting the hypothesis
that adopting AI technology improves corporate financial performance.
In the simplest specification (column 1) with only year and
industry fixed effects, the AI coefficient is positive and significant at the
5 % level, indicating a baseline positive relationship. As we progressively
add control variables for profitability (ROE), liquidity, leverage
(FL), board independence (Indep), and institutional ownership (INST) in
columns (2) through (6), the magnitude of the AI coefficient remains
positive and becomes even more significant (reaching the 1 % significance
level in later models). By the full model (column 6), which includes
all controls, AI adoption shows a robust positive effect on FIN.
This suggests that, holding constant a firm’s profitability, financial
structure, and governance, greater use of AI is associated with better
financial outcomes. The positive relationship aligns with the view that
AI serves as a productivity-enhancing technology that can streamline
operations, reduce costs, and improve decision-making quality, ultimately
strengthening financial performance. For instance, Mishra,
Ewing, and Cooper (2022) find that a strategic focus on AI is associated
with improvements in firms’ net profitability and efficiency, and Babina
et al. (2024) show that firms investing in AI experience higher growth
and market value primarily through innovation gains. Our findings
corroborate these insights, indicating that even after accounting for firm
profitability (ROE) and other factors, AI adoption provides an incremental
boost to financial outcomes.
It is worth noting the role of control variables in the baseline regressions.
Firm profitability (ROE) alone does not show a consistent
significant effect on FIN in these regressions (its coefficient is small and
statistically insignificant in columns 2–6), suggesting that FIN captures
aspects of financial performance or stability not fully reflected by current
ROE. Liquidity, on the other hand, has a strong positive effect on
FIN that is highly significant across models (columns 3–6). This implies
that firms with more liquid assets enjoy better financial health or performance,
which is intuitive if FIN represents financial stability or
Variables (FIN) (lnAI) (ROE) (Liquid) (FL) (Indep) (INST)
FIN 1.000
lnAI− 0.021*** 1.000
ROE− 0.001− 0.023*** 1.000
Liquid 0.187***− 0.083*** 0.014** 1.000
FL− 0.095*** 0.063***− 0.298***− 0.242*** 1.000
Indep 0.057***− 0.032*** 0.000 0.026***− 0.013** 1.000
INST− 0.047*** 0.041*** 0.150***− 0.158*** 0.017***− 0.067*** 1.000
*** p < 0.01, ** p < 0.05, * p < 0.1
8
X. Deng and C. Qin Table 6
Baseline regression.
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
(1) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6)
Variables FIN FIN FIN FIN FIN FIN
lnAI 0.004** 0.004** 0.006*** 0.006*** 0.007*** 0.007***
(2.120) (2.114) (3.405) (3.441) (3.535) (3.622)
ROE− 0.003− 0.004− 0.014− 0.014− 0.011
(− 0.283) (− 0.411) (− 1.347) (− 1.376) (− 0.998)
Liquid 0.006*** 0.006*** 0.006*** 0.006***
(15.950) (15.138) (15.115) (14.868)
FL− 0.003***− 0.003***− 0.003***
(− 4.103) (− 4.119) (− 4.122)
Indep 0.057*** 0.056***
(3.465) (3.372)
INST− 0.007**
(− 2.034)
Constant 0.045*** 0.046*** 0.028*** 0.033*** 0.011* 0.014**
(25.339) (21.853) (12.168) (11.726) (1.652) (2.093)
Observations 30,070 30,070 30,070 30,070 30,070 30,070
R-squared 0.125 0.125 0.159 0.159 0.161 0.161
YEAR YES YES YES YES YES YES
IND YES YES YES YES YES YES
capacity. Financial leverage exhibits a significant negative coefficient
(from column 4 onward), meaning heavily leveraged firms tend to have
worse outcomes on the FIN measure – consistent with higher debt
undermining financial stability. Board independence has a positive and
significant effect (columns 5 and 6), indicating that firms with a greater
proportion of independent directors achieve better financial results,
possibly due to improved oversight and strategic guidance. Meanwhile,
the coefficient on institutional ownership (INST) is negative and significant
in the full model (column 6). This finding may appear counterintuitive
since institutional investors often improve governance;
however, it could suggest that in this context, higher institutional
shareholding is associated with firms that take on more risks or have
lower FIN values. One interpretation is that institutional investors might
push management toward aggressive strategies that elevate short-term
returns at the expense of the particular financial outcome measured
by FIN. In sum, the baseline regressions confirm a positive impact of AI
adoption on firm financial status while controlling for key financial and
governance variables. The results support Hypothesis 1, which posited
that AI utilization would enhance firms’ financial performance or
condition.
4.4. Endogeneity and robustness checks
4.4.1. Robustness checks
We conducted several robustness tests (Table 7) to verify that the
positive AI-FIN relationship is not an artifact of specific measures or
model assumptions. The first robustness check (column 1) uses an
alternative proxy for AI adoption (“AI_replace”), replacing the original
lnAI variable with a different metric (for example, an AI investment
intensity or an indicator of AI presence). Reassuringly, the coefficient on
this alternative AI measure is positive and significant, consistent with
the baseline result. In column 2, the dependent variable is replaced:
Table 7
Robustness checks.
(1) (2) (3) (4) (5)
Variables FIN FIN_dum FIN FIN FIN
lnAI 0.023*** 0.032*
(2.612) (1.773)
L.lnAI 0.007***
(3.629)
L2.lnAI 0.006***
(2.909)
AI_replace 0.341***
(3.291)
ROE 0.001− 0.001− 0.007 0.013 0.100***
(0.147) (− 0.017) (− 0.562) (0.968) (3.126)
Liquid 0.004***− 0.017*** 0.006*** 0.007*** 0.003*
(12.789) (− 11.753) (13.325) (12.068) (1.730)
FL− 0.002*** 0.004− 0.003***− 0.003*** 0.003
(− 3.889) (1.116) (− 3.477) (− 3.642) (0.492)
Indep 0.036*** 0.029 0.056*** 0.065*** 0.516***
(2.891) (0.433) (3.050) (3.330) (2.933)
INST− 0.002 0.069***− 0.010**− 0.013***− 0.163***
(− 0.630) (4.147) (− 2.404) (− 2.909) (− 4.991)
Constant 0.020*** 0.766*** 0.014* 0.011− 0.178**
(3.696) (26.581) (1.791) (1.331) (− 2.219)
Observations 28,941 29,870 22,446 18,741 22,447
R-squared 0.157 0.161 0.163 0.158
YEAR YES YES YES YES YES
IND YES YES YES YES YES
Hansen/Sargen:P =0.000
AR(1):P =0.000
AR(2):P =0.181
9
X. Deng and C. Qin instead of the continuous FIN, a dummy variable (FIN_dum) is used to
indicate high financial performance (for instance, whether FIN exceeds a
certain threshold). The AI coefficient remains positive and significant in
this logistic/probit model, suggesting that AI adoption increases the
likelihood of superior financial outcomes. Columns 3 and 4 introduce
temporal lags to address potential reverse causality – using one-period
and two-period lagged AI (L.lnAI and L2.lnAI) as the key independent
variables. The lagged AI terms continue to show positive and highly
significant effects on FIN. This timing evidence strengthens a causal
interpretation: past AI adoption predicts current financial improvements,
which is consistent with AI investments taking time to translate
into better performance.
Finally, column 5 of Table 7 implements a dynamic panel approach
using a system GMM estimator. This method controls for unobserved
firm heterogeneity and potential endogeneity of AI adoption by using
internal instruments (including lagged variables). The system GMM
result also indicates a positive impact of AI on FIN (significant at the 10
% level). Although the significance is slightly lower in GMM, the coefficient
remains in line with prior magnitudes, suggesting the effect is
robust even after addressing endogeneity concerns. The diagnostic tests
for the GMM model are acceptable: the Hansen test p-value (reported
below the table) is reasonably high, indicating the instruments are valid
overall, and there is no second-order serial correlation (AR(2) p =
0.181). Collectively, these robustness checks confirm that our main
finding is not sensitive to alternative specifications. Whether we alter
the measurement of AI or FIN, introduce time lags, or apply more
stringent estimation techniques, AI adoption consistently emerges as a
beneficial factor for firms’ financial outcomes. This consistency bolsters
our confidence in the conclusion that adopting AI genuinely contributes
to improved financial performance rather than reflecting spurious correlations.
It also accords with broader evidence that advanced digital
technologies tend to enhance firm value when properly implemented
(Bo, Li, Zhang, & Tang, 2025). The robustness of the results suggests that
the positive relationship is structural and can be interpreted through
theoretical lenses such as the resource-based view – whereby AI capabilities
become valuable organizational resources – and dynamic capability
theory, which posits that firms adept at integrating new
technologies can better adapt and excel financially (Teece, 2007).
4.4.2. Addressing endogeneity concerns
A potential concern in our analysis is endogeneity arising from
reverse causality, omitted variable bias, or simultaneity. Specifically,
firms with stronger financial positions or greater financial asset holdings
may possess more resources to invest in expensive AI technologies,
creating a reverse causal pathway from financialization to AI adoption
rather than the hypothesized direction. Additionally, unobserved firm
characteristics such as managerial quality, organizational culture, or
strategic orientation may simultaneously influence both AI adoption
decisions and financial asset allocation strategies, leading to omitted
variable bias. Furthermore, AI adoption and financialization decisions
may be jointly determined as part of broader corporate strategy, introducing
simultaneity bias. To address these endogeneity concerns
comprehensively, we employ three distinct approaches: instrumental
variable estimation, propensity score matching, and the Heckman two-
stage selection model.
Instrumental Variable Approach. We first employ a two-stage least
squares (2SLS) regression using the one-period lagged value of AI
adoption as an instrument. The lagged AI adoption (L.lnAI) serves as a
valid instrument for several theoretical and empirical reasons. First, it
satisfies the relevance condition: past AI investment strongly predicts
current AI adoption due to the cumulative and path-dependent nature of
technology implementation. Firms that invested in AI in the previous
period are highly likely to continue and expand their AI initiatives, as AI
deployment involves substantial learning curves, complementary investments
in digital infrastructure and human capital, and organizational
adaptation processes that unfold over multiple periods. Second,
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
the instrument satisfies the exclusion restriction: lagged AI adoption
affects current financialization only through its influence on current AI
adoption, not directly. Any direct effects of past AI investment on current
financial asset holdings would have materialized in the previous
period and are absorbed by our model’s year fixed effects and firm-level
controls.
Table 8 presents the instrumental variable estimation results. Column
1 reports the first-stage regression where current AI adoption (lnAI)
is regressed on its one-period lag (L.lnAI) and all control variables. The
coefficient on lagged AI is 0.894 and extremely significant (t =156.610,
p < 0.001), indicating a very strong predictive relationship. This confirms
the relevance of our instrument: firms with higher AI adoption in
the previous period exhibit substantially higher current AI adoption,
with an elasticity near unity reflecting strong persistence. The first-stage
F-statistic would be exceptionally high given this t-statistic, far
exceeding conventional thresholds for weak instrument concerns.
Column 2 presents the second-stage results where financialization is
regressed on instrumented AI adoption. The coefficient on AI adoption
increases to 0.008 and remains highly significant (t =6.670, p <0.001),
suggesting that after addressing endogeneity, the positive effect of AI on
financialization is even stronger than in baseline OLS estimates. This
indicates that endogeneity bias, if present, was actually attenuating the
true effect rather than inflating it. The instrumental variable estimate
being larger than OLS is consistent with measurement error in AI
adoption (which biases OLS downward) or with reverse causality being
weaker than anticipated.
The bottom panel of Table 8 reports diagnostic tests for instrument
validity. The Kleibergen-Paap rank LM statistic tests whether the equation
is identified, with a value of 4871.801 (p <0.001) strongly rejecting
underidentification. The Kleibergen-Paap rank Wald F-statistic tests for
weak instruments, yielding a value of 35,000, which vastly exceeds the
Stock-Yogo critical value of 16.38 for 10 % maximal IV size. These diagnostics
confirm that our instrument is both relevant and sufficiently
strong, providing confidence in the 2SLS estimates. The control variables
in the second stage exhibit patterns similar to baseline regressions,
with liquidity, leverage, and board independence showing expected
significant effects, further supporting result robustness.
Propensity Score Matching Approach. As a second robustness
check, we employ propensity score matching (PSM) to address potential
selection bias arising from systematic differences between AI-adopting
Table 8
Instrumental variable estimation.
(1) (2)
Variables lnAI FIN
lnAI 0.008***
(6.670)
L.lnAI 0.894***
(156.610)
ROE− 0.031*− 0.007
(− 1.727) (− 0.803)
Liquid− 0.000 0.006***
(− 0.625) (18.505)
FL 0.001− 0.003***
(0.379) (− 5.153)
Indep− 0.014 0.056***
(− 0.632) (5.582)
INST 0.008− 0.010***
(1.528) (− 4.343)
Constant 0.110*** 0.038***
(9.650) (3.500)
Observations 22,446 22,447
R-squared 0.846 0.162
YEAR YES YES
IND YES YES
Kleibergen-Paap rk LM 4871.801 (P =0.000)
Kleibergen-Paap rk Wald F 3.5e+04 (Critical value =16.38)
Robust t-statistics in parentheses. *** p <0.01, ** p <0.05, * p <0.1.
10
X. Deng and C. Qin and non-adopting firms. If firms self-select into AI adoption based on
observable characteristics that also affect financialization, simple OLS
estimates may be biased. PSM addresses this by constructing a counterfactual:
what would financialization look like for AI adopters had
they not adopted AI, estimated using matched non-adopters with similar
observable characteristics.
We implement one-to-one nearest neighbor matching without
replacement. In the first stage (not reported), we estimate a probit model
predicting AI adoption as a binary treatment (firms above median AI
adoption versus below) based on all control variables, year, and industry
indicators. We then match each treated firm to the most similar control
firm based on propensity scores, ensuring common support and balance
across covariates. Table 9 presents the second-stage OLS regression on
the matched sample of 16,356 observations.
The results strongly confirm our baseline findings. AI adoption retains
a positive and significant effect on financialization with a coefficient
of 0.007 (t =3.321, p <0.01), nearly identical to the baseline full-
sample estimate. This consistency indicates that selection on observables
does not substantially bias our main results. The control variables
also exhibit patterns consistent with baseline regressions: liquidity
shows strong positive effects, leverage negative effects, and board independence
positive effects. The reduction in sample size from 30,070 to
16,356 reflects the matching procedure dropping unmatched observations,
yet the core relationship remains robust in this more comparable
subsample.
Heckman Selection Model. Finally, we employ the Heckman two-
stage selection model to address potential sample selection bias. This
approach is appropriate if the decision to adopt AI and the level of
financialization are related through correlated unobservables. The
Heckman model explicitly accounts for selection into AI adoption in the
first stage and corrects for selection bias in the second stage outcome
equation for financialization.
Table 10 presents the Heckman second-stage results. The coefficient
on AI adoption is 0.032 and significant (t =2.937, p < 0.01), again
confirming a positive effect, though larger in magnitude than baseline
estimates. Critically, the inverse Mills ratio (imr1) is negative and significant
(coefficient =− 0.600, t =− 2.398, p < 0.05), indicating that
selection bias is indeed present and negative. This suggests that unobserved
factors making firms more likely to adopt AI are associated with
lower financialization, and failing to account for this selection would
underestimate the true positive effect of AI. The significant Mills ratio
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
Table 10
Heckman selection model.
(1)
Variables FIN
lnAI 0.032***
(2.937)
imr1− 0.600**
(− 2.398)
ROE 0.213**
(2.266)
Liquid 0.008***
(6.918)
FL 0.044**
(2.228)
Indep− 0.276**
(− 1.963)
INST 0.029*
(1.847)
Constant 0.490**
(2.471)
Observations 30,070
R-squared 0.162
YEAR YES
IND YES
Robust t-statistics in parentheses. *** p <0.01, **
p <0.05, * p <0.1.
Note: imr1 represents the inverse Mills ratio from
the first-stage selection equation.
validates our use of the Heckman procedure and demonstrates the
importance of addressing selection concerns.
Interestingly, some control variable coefficients differ from baseline
estimates in the Heckman model. ROE becomes positive and significant,
and leverage shows a positive coefficient, contrary to baseline patterns.
These differences likely reflect the correction for selection bias and the
different sample variation exploited by the Heckman approach. Despite
these differences in controls, the key finding that AI adoption positively
affects financialization remains robust and indeed strengthens after
correcting for selection.
Table 9
Propensity score matching results.
(1)
Variables FIN
lnAI 0.007***
(3.321)
ROE− 0.010
(− 0.793)
Liquid 0.006***
(12.601)
FL− 0.003***
(− 2.985)
Indep 0.064***
(3.461)
INST− 0.009**
(− 2.139)
Constant 0.011
(1.397)
Observations 16,356
R-squared 0.166
YEAR YES
IND YES
Robust t-statistics in parentheses. *** p <0.01, ** p
<0.05, * p <0.1.
Note: Results based on 1:1 nearest neighbor matching
without replacement.
4.5. Mediation analysis: Profitability and financing constraints
To delve deeper into the mechanisms through which AI adoption
influences corporate financialization, we examine two potential mediating
pathways: enhanced profitability and reduced financing constraints.
Understanding these channels is crucial for both theoretical
development and practical implications, as it reveals not merely
whether AI affects financialization, but how and why this relationship
operates. We employ the Baron and Kenny mediation framework, conducting
formal mediation tests through sequential regression models
that isolate the indirect effects operating through each proposed
mediator.
Profitability Channel. Table 11 explores the mediating role of
profitability, measured as net profit margin (NetProfit). Column 1 presents
the first-stage regression examining whether AI adoption influences
firm profitability. The coefficient on AI adoption (lnAI) is 0.006
and highly significant (t = 2.824, p < 0.01), indicating that firms
investing more heavily in AI technologies achieve higher net profit
margins. This finding aligns with the resource-based view and existing
empirical evidence: AI technologies enhance productivity by optimizing
operations, improving decision quality, reducing costs, and enabling
better resource allocation (Chen et al., 2022). The economic magnitude
suggests that a one standard deviation increase in AI adoption is associated
with approximately a 0.29 percentage point increase in net profit
margin, representing meaningful profitability gains.Among control
variables in column 1, return on equity (ROE) shows an exceptionally
strong positive relationship with net profit margin (coefficient =0.698,
t =50.261, p < 0.001), which is unsurprising given both measures
11
X. Deng and C. Qin Table 11
Mediating role of profitability.
(1) (2)
Variables NetProfit FIN
lnAI 0.006*** 0.006***
(2.824) (3.177)
NetProfit 0.168***
(9.801)
ROE 0.698***− 0.128***
(50.261) (− 8.083)
Liquid 0.014*** 0.003***
(38.691) (7.374)
FL− 0.006***− 0.002***
(− 9.443) (− 2.739)
Indep 0.026* 0.052***
(1.817) (3.205)
INST− 0.008**− 0.006*
(− 2.436) (− 1.670)
Constant 0.001 0.014**
(0.110) (2.119)
Observations 30,070 30,070
R-squared 0.537 0.178
YEAR YES YES
IND YES YES
capture profitability dimensions. Liquidity also positively predicts
profitability (coefficient =0.014, t =38.691, p <0.001), suggesting that
firms maintaining adequate liquid resources achieve better profit performance,
possibly reflecting financial flexibility to seize opportunities.
Conversely, financial leverage negatively affects profitability (coefficient
=− 0.006, t =− 9.443, p < 0.001), consistent with theories that
high debt burdens impose financial distress costs and constrain operational
flexibility. Board independence shows a marginally positive effect
(coefficient =0.026, p <0.10), while institutional ownership exhibits a
small negative coefficient (coefficient =− 0.008, p <0.05), suggesting
complex governance-performance relationships that merit further
investigation.
Column 2 presents the second-stage regression where financialization
is regressed on both AI adoption and the profitability mediator. The
coefficient on net profit margin is 0.168 and highly significant (t =
9.801, p < 0.001), indicating that more profitable firms hold substantially
higher levels of financial assets. This relationship supports the
theoretical expectation that profitability generates surplus internal
funds, which managers may allocate to financial investments when
immediate reinvestment opportunities in core operations are limited or
when maintaining financial flexibility is valued. The positive
profitability-financialization link is consistent with free cash flow theory
(Jensen, 1986) and the notion that profitable firms accumulate financial
reserves as strategic buffers or for future deployment.
Critically, after including net profit margin in the model, the coefficient
on AI adoption remains positive and significant (coefficient =
0.006, t =3.177, p < 0.01), though its magnitude is slightly reduced
compared to the baseline specification without the mediator. This
attenuation of the direct AI effect, combined with significant effects in
both mediation stages, provides evidence of partial mediation. The
formal Sobel test reported in Table 13 confirms this interpretation: the
indirect effect of AI on financialization operating through profitability is
statistically significant (z =6.027, p < 0.001), and point estimates
indicate that approximately 14 % of the total AI effect operates through
the profitability channel. The bootstrap mediation test in Table 14
further corroborates this finding, with bias-corrected confidence intervals
for the indirect effect excluding zero at the 99 % confidence level.
These results provide strong support for Hypothesis 2: AI adoption increases
corporate financialization partly by enhancing firm profitability,
which generates surplus funds that are subsequently allocated to
financial assets. However, the substantial remaining direct effect indicates
that profitability is only one of multiple pathways through which
AI influences financial asset holdings. In economic interpretation, AI-
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
driven efficiency gains and revenue enhancements translate into
higher profits, and a portion of these profits flows into financial portfolios
rather than being immediately reinvested in physical assets or
distributed to shareholders. This pattern is particularly relevant in the
Chinese context where investment opportunities in traditional industries
may be limited due to overcapacity (Xu & Xuan, 2021), making financial
asset accumulation an attractive alternative use of AI-generated profits.
Financing Constraints Channel. Table 12 examines the second
mediating mechanism: financing constraints, measured using the SA
index where higher values indicate greater financial constraint. Column
1 presents the first-stage regression examining whether AI adoption affects
financing constraints. The coefficient on AI adoption is negative
and significant (coefficient =− 0.019, t =− 2.752, p <0.01), indicating
that firms with higher AI adoption experience reduced financing constraints.
This finding aligns with recent evidence by Zhong and Song
(2025) and supports the theoretical expectation that AI adoption improves
firms’ access to external capital.
Several mechanisms may explain this relationship. First, AI adoption
signals to investors and lenders that the firm is innovative and forward-
looking, enhancing its reputation and creditworthiness. Second, AI
implementation often improves operational performance and reduces
earnings volatility, making firms less risky in creditors’ assessments.
Third, in the Chinese institutional context, government policies
increasingly favor technology-oriented firms with preferential financing
access and subsidies. Fourth, successful AI deployment generates valuable
intangible assets including data capabilities and algorithmic know-
how that, while difficult to collateralize directly, strengthen the firm’s
overall competitive position and future cash flow prospects, thereby
improving financing terms.
Among control variables in column 1, profitability (ROE) shows a
strong negative relationship with financing constraints (coefficient =
− 0.199, t =− 5.073, p <0.001), confirming that more profitable firms
face fewer financing frictions. Liquidity also negatively predicts constraints
(coefficient =− 0.016, t =− 17.219, p <0.001), as liquid firms
have less need for external financing. Board independence exhibits a
negative coefficient (coefficient =− 0.213, t =− 3.285, p <0.01), suggesting
that better governance facilitates financing access, while institutional
ownership shows a marginally negative effect (coefficient =
− 0.028, p <0.05).
Column 2 presents the second-stage regression where financialization
is regressed on both AI adoption and the financing constraint
measure. The coefficient on financing constraints is negative and highly
Table 12
Mediating role of financing constraints.
(1) (2)
Variables FC FIN
lnAI− 0.019*** 0.005***
(− 2.752) (3.166)
FC− 0.014***
(− 4.572)
ROE− 0.199***− 0.007
(− 5.073) (− 0.808)
Liquid− 0.016*** 0.004***
(− 17.219) (11.602)
FL 0.004− 0.003***
(1.383) (− 4.360)
Indep− 0.213*** 0.042***
(− 3.285) (2.996)
INST− 0.028**− 0.007**
(− 1.964) (− 2.313)
Constant 3.988*** 0.073***
(142.324) (5.431)
Observations 28,844 28,844
R-squared 0.245 0.141
YEAR YES YES
IND YES YES
12
X. Deng and C. Qin significant (coefficient =− 0.014, t =− 4.572, p < 0.001), indicating
that firms facing tighter financing constraints hold lower levels of
financial assets. This negative relationship might initially seem counterintuitive,
as one might expect constrained firms to hoard more precautionary
cash. However, the result is consistent with constrained firms
having less free cash flow available to accumulate financial assets, and
possibly facing pressure to deploy limited resources in revenue-
generating core activities rather than passive financial investments.
After including the financing constraint mediator, the direct effect of
AI adoption on financialization remains positive and significant (coefficient
=0.005, t =3.166, p <0.01), though slightly attenuated relative
to the baseline. The Sobel test in Table 13 confirms significant mediation
through the financing constraint channel (z =4.798, p < 0.001), with
approximately 5 % of the total AI effect operating through this pathway.
The bootstrap analysis in Table 14 corroborates this, showing that the
indirect effect through financing constraints is positive (AI reduces
constraints, which increases financialization through the negative
constraint-financialization relationship) and statistically significant.
These findings provide support for Hypothesis 3, though the mechanism
operates somewhat differently than initially theorized. We proposed
that AI adoption would ease financing constraints, which would
reduce the need for precautionary financial asset holdings. While AI
does indeed reduce constraints, the negative relationship between constraints
and financialization suggests that the channel operates through
increased financial capacity rather than reduced precautionary motives.
Firms with better financing access (lower constraints) actually hold
more financial assets, possibly because they have greater cash flows
available and less pressure to deploy every dollar in immediate operations.
This interpretation aligns with the view that financial asset
holdings reflect not just precautionary savings but also strategic
deployment of surplus resources.
Comparing the Dual Mediation Pathways. To formally assess the
significance and relative magnitude of the two mediating mechanisms,
we conduct Sobel tests and bootstrap analyses. Table 13 presents the
Sobel test results, which evaluate whether the indirect effects through
each mediator are statistically distinguishable from zero. For the profitability
channel, the Sobel z-statistic is 6.027 with a p-value of 1.666e-
09, strongly confirming significant mediation. The proportion of the
total AI effect operating through profitability is approximately 0.1398,
indicating that roughly 14 % of AI’s impact on financialization occurs
via enhanced profitability. For the financing constraint channel, the
Sobel z-statistic is 4.798 with a p-value of 1.599e-06, also confirming
significant mediation, though the proportion of mediation is smaller at
0.0511, representing approximately 5 % of the total effect.
To further validate these findings and obtain more robust confidence
intervals that do not rely on normality assumptions, we conduct bootstrap
mediation analyses with 1000 replications. Table 14 reports the
bootstrap results with bias-corrected confidence intervals. For the
profitability mediator, the indirect effect coefficient is 0.0009326 (z =
5.44, p < 0.001), with a 95 % confidence interval of [0.0006146,
0.0013131] that clearly excludes zero, confirming significant positive
mediation. The direct effect of AI on financialization after accounting for
profitability mediation remains 0.0057384 (z =5.93, p <0.001), indicating
substantial direct pathways beyond profitability. For the
financing constraint mediator, the indirect effect is 0.0002702 (z =4.84,
p <0.001), with a confidence interval of [0.0001728, 0.0003933], again
excluding zero and confirming significant mediation. The direct effect
after accounting for financing constraint mediation is 0.0050148 (z =
5.43, p <0.001).
Table 13
Mediation test: Sobel statistics.
Mediators statistics P value Proportion of mediating effect
NetProfit 6.027 1.666e-09 0.1397964
FC 4.798 1.599e-06 0.05112784
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
4.6. Moderating effects of digital environment and technology
Having established that AI adoption positively influences corporate
financialization through profitability enhancement and financing
constraint alleviation, we now examine the boundary conditions of this
relationship. Not all firms benefit equally from AI adoption; the effectiveness
of AI in reshaping financial asset allocation likely depends on
complementary organizational capabilities and environmental conditions.
We investigate three moderating factors operating at different
levels: firm-level digital transformation foundation, managerial-level
top management team technological cognition, and regional-level digital
infrastructure. These analyses test Hypotheses 4, 5, and 6, respectively,
and provide insights into when and where AI adoption most
strongly influences corporate financialization.
Digital Transformation Foundation. Table 15 examines whether a
firm’s existing digital transformation foundation moderates the AI-
financialization relationship. We measure digital transformation foundation
(DIG) as the proportion of intangible assets related to digital
technology relative to total intangible assets, reflecting the firm’s
baseline digital capability and infrastructure. Column 1 presents a model
including both AI adoption and DIG as main effects. The coefficient on
AI remains positive and significant (coefficient =0.006, t =3.463, p <
0.01), consistent with baseline findings. The coefficient on DIG itself is
negative but statistically insignificant (coefficient = − 0.004, t =
− 0.768), suggesting that digital foundation alone does not directly
predict financialization levels after controlling for other factors.
Column 2 introduces the critical interaction term between AI adoption
and digital foundation (DIG ×lnAI). The interaction coefficient is
positive and highly significant (coefficient =0.024, t =3.056, p <0.01),
providing strong support for Hypothesis 4. This positive interaction indicates
that the effect of AI adoption on financialization is significantly
amplified in firms with stronger digital transformation foundations. In
economic terms, firms that have already invested substantially in digital
infrastructure, software platforms, data management systems, and
related intangible assets derive greater financial benefits from AI
adoption than firms with weaker digital foundations. The main effect of
AI remains significant (coefficient =0.006, t =3.494, p <0.01), while
the DIG main effect becomes positive though remains insignificant
(coefficient = 0.006, t = 0.990).This moderating effect aligns with
theories of technological complementarity and absorptive capacity. AI
technologies do not operate in isolation but require supporting digital
infrastructure to function effectively. Firms with robust digital foundations
possess the necessary data systems, connectivity, and digital skills
that enable AI tools to be implemented seamlessly and deliver maximum
value. For instance, machine learning algorithms require quality data,
which depends on existing data collection and management systems. AI-
driven analytics need integration with enterprise resource planning
systems and business intelligence platforms. Cloud-based AI applications
demand adequate network infrastructure and cybersecurity capabilities.
Firms lacking these complementary digital assets struggle to
fully exploit AI’s potential, resulting in weaker impacts on performance
and consequently on financial outcomes.
The finding that digital foundation moderates rather than directly
affects financialization is theoretically informative. It suggests that
digital capabilities matter primarily in conjunction with AI adoption
rather than independently. Simply possessing digital infrastructure
without deploying advanced AI applications does not substantially alter
financial asset strategies. However, when AI is introduced into an
already digitally mature organization, a synergistic effect emerges that
magnifies AI’s impact on generating surplus funds and improving
financial positions, ultimately leading to greater financialization. This
highlights the importance of sequential technology investments: firms
should build digital foundations before or concurrent with AI adoption
to maximize returns.
Control variables in Table 15 exhibit patterns consistent with prior
specifications. Liquidity shows strong positive effects, leverage negative
13
X. Deng and C. Qin International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
Table 14
Mediation test: Bootstrap analysis.
Moderators Effect Coefficient Standard error Z value P value 95 % confidence interval(Bias-corrected)
NetProfit Indirect 0.0009326 0.0001716 5.44 0.000 0.0006146 0.0013131
Direct 0.0057384 0.0009671 5.93 0.000 0.0038139 0.007734
FC Indirect 0.0002702 0.0000559 4.84 0.000 0.0001728 0.0003933
Direct 0.0050148 0.0009229 5.43 0.000 0.003002 0.0067397
Table 15
Moderating effect of DIG.
(1) (2)
Variables FIN FIN
lnAI 0.006*** 0.006***
(3.463) (3.494)
DIG− 0.004 0.006
(− 0.768) (0.990)
DIG x lnAI 0.024***
(3.056)
ROE− 0.010− 0.010
(− 0.985) (− 0.951)
Liquid 0.006*** 0.006***
(14.883) (14.902)
FL− 0.003***− 0.003***
(− 4.135) (− 4.056)
Indep 0.056*** 0.056***
(3.355) (3.374)
INST− 0.007**− 0.008**
(− 2.059) (− 2.140)
Constant 0.015** 0.014**
(2.161) (2.094)
Observations 30,018 30,018
R-squared 0.161 0.162
YEAR YES YES
IND YES YES
effects, and board independence positive effects on financialization
across both columns. These stable relationships across various model
specifications reinforce confidence in our findings.
Top Management Team Technological Cognition. Table 16 explores
whether the technological expertise and digital awareness of top
management moderate the AI-financialization relationship. We measure
top management team technological cognition (TMTECH) as an ordinal
index ranging from 0 to 3, where higher values indicate greater
Table 16
Moderating effect of TMTECH.
(1) (2)
Variables FIN FIN
lnAI 0.007*** 0.007***
(3.600) (3.577)
TMTECH− 0.001**− 0.002***
(− 2.540) (− 2.666)
TMTECH x lnAI 0.003**
(2.302)
ROE− 0.010− 0.010
(− 0.984) (− 0.958)
Liquid 0.006*** 0.006***
(14.922) (14.937)
FL− 0.003***− 0.003***
(− 4.151) (− 4.149)
Indep 0.055*** 0.055***
(3.297) (3.305)
INST− 0.007**− 0.007**
(− 2.086) (− 2.104)
Constant 0.017** 0.017**
(2.449) (2.470)
Observations 30,070 30,070
R-squared 0.162 0.162
YEAR YES YES
IND YES YES
technology orientation in leadership, with 3 representing firms where
the CEO or board chair possesses strong digital technology background.
Column 1 presents main effects of both AI adoption and TMTECH. The
AI coefficient remains positive and significant (coefficient =0.007, t =
3.600, p < 0.01). Interestingly, TMTECH shows a negative and
marginally significant main effect (coefficient =− 0.001, t =− 2.540, p
< 0.05), suggesting that in the absence of AI adoption, technology-
oriented management is associated with slightly lower financialization,
possibly reflecting a preference for reinvesting in technological
innovation rather than accumulating financial assets.
Column 2 introduces the interaction term (TMTECH ×lnAI). The
interaction coefficient is positive and significant (coefficient =0.003, t
=2.302, p < 0.05), supporting Hypothesis 5. This indicates that the
positive effect of AI adoption on financialization is more pronounced in
firms led by technologically savvy management teams. The economic
interpretation is that leaders with strong technology backgrounds are
better positioned to successfully implement AI initiatives, extract value
from AI investments, and strategically manage the resulting financial
outcomes. The TMTECH main effect becomes slightly more negative
(coefficient =− 0.002, t =− 2.666, p <0.01) after including the interaction,
reinforcing that technology cognition matters primarily through
its interaction with AI adoption rather than as a standalone factor.
Several mechanisms may explain this moderating effect. First,
technologically literate managers possess deeper understanding of AI
capabilities and limitations, enabling them to make better decisions
about where and how to deploy AI within the organization. This leads to
more effective AI implementation and greater performance gains. Second,
tech-savvy leaders may be more adept at interpreting AI-generated
insights and integrating them into strategic decision-making, including
financial asset management decisions. Third, top managers with technology
backgrounds likely champion AI initiatives more effectively
within the organization, securing necessary resources and overcoming
resistance to change. Fourth, such leaders may have better networks in
technology ecosystems, facilitating access to cutting-edge AI tools,
talent, and best practices.The finding aligns with upper echelons theory,
which posits that organizational outcomes reflect top managers’
cognitive bases and values. In the context of emerging technologies like
AI, managerial cognition becomes particularly critical because AI
implementation involves substantial uncertainty, requires significant
organizational change, and demands strategic choices about resource
allocation. Leaders lacking technological understanding may underinvest
in AI, misallocate AI resources, or fail to capture AI-generated
value, resulting in weaker impacts on firm outcomes including
financialization.
Importantly, the negative main effect of TMTECH suggests nuanced
relationships. Technology-oriented managers, when not deploying AI,
may actually pursue strategies that reduce financialization, perhaps by
channeling resources into R&D and innovation rather than financial
investments. However, when these same managers adopt AI technologies,
the combination proves powerful, yielding amplified effects on
financial asset accumulation. This pattern underscores that managerial
orientation and technological capability are complementary: maximum
benefits emerge when both are present.
Regional Digital Infrastructure. Table 17 examines whether
regional digital infrastructure moderates the AI-financialization relationship.
We measure regional digital infrastructure (INF) based on the
frequency of digital infrastructure-related keywords in city-level
14
X. Deng and C. Qin Table 17
Moderating effect of INF.
(1) (2)
Variables FIN FIN
lnAI 0.007*** 0.007***
(3.451) (3.503)
INF 0.017− 0.087
(0.023) (− 0.121)
INF x lnAI 2.294***
(2.612)
ROE 0.003 0.003
(0.240) (0.257)
Liquid 0.006*** 0.006***
(12.930) (12.943)
FL− 0.002***− 0.002***
(− 3.124) (− 3.070)
Indep 0.055*** 0.054***
(3.105) (3.070)
INST− 0.010**− 0.010**
(− 2.554) (− 2.561)
Constant 0.012 0.012
(1.547) (1.605)
Observations 21,098 21,098
R-squared 0.172 0.172
YEAR YES YES
IND YES YES
government work reports, reflecting the emphasis on and quality of
digital infrastructure development in the firm’s operating region. Column
1 presents main effects of AI adoption and INF. The AI coefficient
remains positive and significant (coefficient =0.007, t =3.451, p <
0.01). The INF main effect is positive but statistically insignificant (coefficient
=0.017, t =0.023), indicating that regional infrastructure
alone does not directly predict firm-level financialization after controlling
for firm characteristics.
Column 2 introduces the interaction term (INF ×lnAI). The interaction
coefficient is positive and highly significant (coefficient =2.294,
t =2.612, p < 0.01), providing strong support for Hypothesis 6. This
substantial positive interaction indicates that AI adoption’s effect on
financialization is dramatically stronger in regions with superior digital
infrastructure. The magnitude of this interaction coefficient is notably
larger than the previous moderators, suggesting that regional infrastructure
may be a particularly powerful enabling condition. The INF
main effect becomes negative after including the interaction but remains
insignificant (coefficient =− 0.087, t =− 0.121).
This finding carries important theoretical and practical implications.
Regional digital infrastructure encompasses physical assets like broadband
networks, data centers, and telecommunications systems, as well
as institutional support including government policies favoring digitalization,
availability of technology talent, and presence of technology
service providers. These environmental factors create positive externalities
that amplify individual firms’ AI investments. For instance, in
regions with widespread high-speed internet and 5G networks, AI applications
requiring real-time data processing and cloud connectivity
perform more effectively. In regions with concentrations of AI talent and
service providers, firms can more easily recruit skilled personnel and
access technical support. In regions where government prioritizes digital
economy development, firms may receive subsidies, preferential policies,
and infrastructural support that enhance AI implementation
success.
The result aligns with economic geography and regional innovation
systems literature, which emphasize that firm-level innovation outcomes
depend heavily on regional contexts. AI adoption is not merely a
firm-level decision but occurs within and is shaped by regional ecosystems.
Firms in digitally advanced regions enjoy spillover benefits from
neighboring firms’ digitalization efforts, shared infrastructure, and
knowledge flows that collectively enhance AI effectiveness. Conversely,
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
firms attempting AI adoption in regions lacking digital infrastructure
face higher costs, implementation challenges, and reduced performance
gains, resulting in weaker impacts on financialization.
From a policy perspective, this finding underscores the importance of
regional digital infrastructure investment as a public good that amplifies
private sector AI returns. Governments seeking to promote AI-driven
economic development should prioritize building robust digital infrastructure
that creates favorable conditions for firm-level AI adoption.
The large magnitude of the interaction effect suggests that infrastructure
improvements could yield substantial benefits by enabling firms to fully
realize AI’s potential.
Collectively, the three moderation analyses reveal that AI adoption’s
impact on corporate financialization is highly context-dependent. All
three moderators, operating at firm, managerial, and regional levels,
significantly and positively moderate the AI-financialization relationship,
supporting Hypotheses 4, 5, and 6. The consistent pattern across
these diverse contextual factors underscores a fundamental insight: AI is
not a plug-and-play technology whose benefits materialize automatically.
Rather, AI’s value realization depends critically on complementary
assets, capabilities, and environmental conditions.
The findings align with and extend theories of technological
complementarity and dynamic capabilities (Teece, 2007). AI represents
a general-purpose technology whose productivity gains emerge only
when combined with appropriate organizational capabilities and infrastructure.
Firms with strong digital foundations, technologically savvy
leadership, and favorable regional environments can effectively integrate
AI into operations, leading to substantial performance improvements
and consequent increases in financial asset holdings. In contrast,
firms lacking these complementary factors struggle to extract value from
AI investments, resulting in minimal or no effects on financialization.
From a practical standpoint, these results provide actionable guidance
for managers and policymakers. Managers considering AI adoption
should first assess and strengthen their organizations’ digital readiness,
cultivate technological expertise in leadership teams, and consider
location decisions in relation to regional digital infrastructure. Piecemeal
AI adoption without these complementary investments is unlikely
to yield maximum returns. Policymakers seeking to promote AI-driven
economic growth should invest in public digital infrastructure, support
executive education programs enhancing technological literacy,
and create regional innovation ecosystems that provide supportive environments
for AI adoption. The substantial interaction effects documented
here suggest that such complementary investments could
generate significant returns by enabling firms to fully capture AI’s
transformative potential.
4.7. Heterogeneity analysis
To further explore the boundary conditions of the AI-financialization
relationship, we conduct heterogeneity analyses examining whether the
effect varies across different firm and industry characteristics. Specifically,
we investigate three dimensions of heterogeneity: firm size, industry
digital intensity, and market competition intensity. These
analyses provide additional insights into which types of firms and
competitive contexts exhibit stronger AI-driven financialization effects,
enriching our understanding of when AI adoption most substantially
influences financial asset allocation decisions.
Firm Size Heterogeneity. Table 18, Panel A presents subsample
analyses comparing large-scale enterprises with non-large-scale enterprises,
where large-scale firms are defined as those above the median
total assets in each year. The results reveal striking differences between
the two groups. For large-scale enterprises (column 1), the AI adoption
coefficient is 0.012 and highly significant (t =5.551, p < 0.01), indicating
a strong positive effect on financialization. In contrast, for non-
large-scale enterprises (column 2), the AI coefficient is substantially
smaller at 0.005 and only marginally significant (t =1.719, p <0.10).
The magnitude difference suggests that the AI-financialization
15
X. Deng and C. Qin Table 18
Heterogeneity analysis.
Panel A: Firm Size
Large-scale Firms Non-large-scale Firms
Variables FIN FIN
lnAI 0.012*** 0.005*
(5.551) (1.719)
ROE− 0.005− 0.011
(− 0.401) (− 0.678)
Liquid 0.007*** 0.005***
(8.445) (11.659)
FL− 0.003***− 0.003**
(− 3.304) (− 2.521)
Indep 0.077*** 0.037
(3.363) (1.642)
INST− 0.016***− 0.000
(− 3.236) (− 0.061)
Constant 0.001 0.023**
(0.142) (2.400)
Observations 15,234 14,835
R-squared 0.170 0.182
YEAR YES YES
IND YES YES
Panel B: Industry Digital Intensity
Digital Economy Industries Non-digital Economy Industries
Variables FIN FIN
lnAI 0.011*** 0.002
(4.214) (0.727)
ROE− 0.007− 0.015
(− 0.502) (− 0.991)
Liquid 0.006*** 0.005***
(12.896) (7.856)
FL− 0.004***− 0.002**
(− 4.505) (− 2.053)
Indep 0.057*** 0.057*
(2.980) (1.892)
INST− 0.006− 0.010*
(− 1.301) (− 1.689)
Constant 0.010 0.021*
(1.144) (1.816)
Observations 17,608 12,462
R-squared 0.157 0.173
YEAR YES YES
IND YES YES
Panel C: Market Competition Intensity
Competitive Industries Non-competitive Industries
Variables FIN FIN
lnAI 0.008*** 0.002
(3.969) (0.610)
ROE− 0.010− 0.036*
(− 0.792) (− 1.787)
Liquid 0.006*** 0.001*
(15.053) (1.726)
FL− 0.003***− 0.003***
(− 4.081) (− 3.025)
Indep 0.038** 0.121***
(2.199) (2.931)
INST− 0.007− 0.012*
(− 1.636) (− 1.747)
Constant 0.018** 0.009
(2.399) (0.596)
Observations 23,242 6828
R-squared 0.166 0.173
YEAR YES YES
IND YES YES
Robust t-statistics in parentheses. *** p <0.01, ** p <0.05, * p <0.1.
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
relationship is more than twice as strong in large firms compared to
smaller firms.
This heterogeneity can be explained by several mechanisms. First,
large firms typically possess greater financial resources, technological
capabilities, and organizational slack necessary for successful AI
implementation. They can afford substantial upfront investments in AI
infrastructure, talent acquisition, and system integration that smaller
firms struggle to finance. Second, large firms often operate at scale
where AI applications yield greater marginal benefits through economies
of scale in data collection, processing, and algorithm deployment.
Third, large enterprises may have more complex operations spanning
multiple business units and geographies, creating more opportunities to
apply AI across diverse functions and capture efficiency gains. Fourth,
large firms’ AI initiatives may generate larger absolute increases in
profits and cash flows due to their revenue base, providing more substantial
resources available for financial asset accumulation.
The control variables also exhibit interesting patterns across subsamples.
Board independence shows a strong positive effect on financialization
in large firms (coefficient = 0.077, p < 0.01) but an
insignificant effect in smaller firms, suggesting that governance mechanisms
operate differently across firm sizes. Institutional ownership
exhibits a significant negative coefficient in large firms (coefficient =
− 0.016, p <0.01) but no effect in smaller firms, possibly indicating that
institutional investors in large companies exert stronger pressure against
excessive financial asset accumulation. These differential patterns underscore
the importance of considering firm size when examining
financial strategies.
Industry Digital Intensity Heterogeneity. Panel B of Table 18
compares firms in digital economy industries with those in traditional
non-digital industries. Digital economy industries include information
technology, telecommunications, e-commerce, digital media, and other
sectors where digital technologies constitute core business activities.
The results demonstrate substantial heterogeneity across industry types.
For firms in digital economy industries (column 1), AI adoption shows a
strong positive coefficient of 0.011 (t =4.214, p <0.01). In contrast, for
firms in non-digital economy industries (column 2), the AI coefficient is
small at 0.002 and statistically insignificant (t =0.727).
This pronounced difference suggests that AI’s impact on financialization
is concentrated in digitally intensive sectors. Several factors
explain this pattern. First, digital economy firms possess inherent advantages
in AI adoption due to existing digital infrastructure, data assets,
and technical expertise. Their core competencies align closely with
AI requirements, enabling more effective implementation and value
extraction. Second, AI applications in digital industries may be more
directly revenue-generating, such as recommendation algorithms in e-
commerce, targeted advertising in digital media, or predictive analytics
in fintech, leading to more immediate and substantial profitability improvements.
Third, digital economy firms operate in rapidly evolving
markets where AI provides competitive advantages that translate
quickly into financial performance, generating surplus funds for financial
asset accumulation.
Fourth, digital firms may face greater pressure or opportunity to
deploy AI-generated profits into financial investments rather than
physical assets, given that their business models require relatively less
capital-intensive infrastructure compared to traditional manufacturing.
The control variables show generally consistent patterns across both
subsamples, with liquidity and leverage exhibiting expected significant
effects. However, institutional ownership shows a negative effect only in
non-digital industries, suggesting differential investor preferences or
monitoring intensity across sectors.
Market Competition Intensity Heterogeneity. Panel C of Table 18
examines whether the AI-financialization relationship varies with market
competition intensity. We classify industries as competitive based on
the Herfindahl-Hirschman Index (HHI), with lower HHI values indicating
more competitive markets. For firms in competitive industries
(column 1), AI adoption exhibits a significant positive coefficient of
16
X. Deng and C. Qin 0.008 (t =3.969, p < 0.01). For firms in less competitive industries
(column 2), the AI coefficient is small at 0.002 and statistically insignificant
(t =0.610).
This heterogeneity reveals that AI’s impact on financialization is
stronger in competitive market environments. Several theoretical explanations
account for this pattern. First, in competitive markets, firms
face greater pressure to innovate and improve efficiency to maintain
market position. AI adoption in such contexts may be more intensive and
strategically important, yielding larger performance gains that translate
into increased financialization. Second, competitive environments may
force firms to more aggressively deploy AI to reduce costs and improve
margins, as failure to do so risks competitive disadvantage. The resulting
efficiency gains in competitive settings may be more substantial than in
protected or monopolistic markets where innovation urgency is lower.
Third, firms in competitive industries may have fewer opportunities
for monopoly rents from real sector activities, making financial investments
relatively more attractive as alternative revenue sources. AI-
enhanced profitability in such contexts might flow more readily into
financial assets rather than being reinvested in capacity expansion that
would intensify competition. Fourth, competitive pressure may drive
firms to maintain greater financial flexibility through liquid asset
holdings, allowing rapid responses to competitive threats or opportunities.
AI-generated cash flows in competitive environments might thus
be strategically allocated to financial assets as buffers.
The control variables reveal some interesting differences across
competition intensity. Return on equity (ROE) shows a significant
negative coefficient in non-competitive industries (coefficient =
− 0.036, p < 0.10) but no effect in competitive industries, suggesting
complex profitability-financialization dynamics that vary with market
structure. Board independence exhibits stronger positive effects in non-
competitive industries (coefficient =0.121, p < 0.01) compared to
competitive ones (coefficient =0.038, p < 0.05), possibly reflecting
differential governance needs across market structures. Liquidity shows
strong positive effects in both subsamples, though the magnitude is
larger in competitive industries, consistent with greater liquidity preferences
amid competitive pressure.
The heterogeneity analyses reveal that AI adoption’s impact on
corporate financialization is not uniform but varies systematically across
firm and industry characteristics. The effect is significantly stronger in
large firms, digital economy industries, and competitive markets. These
patterns suggest that AI’s influence on financial asset allocation depends
on organizational capacity (firm size), technological context (digital
intensity), and market conditions (competition).
From a theoretical perspective, these findings align with contingency
theory and resource-based view extensions emphasizing that technology
benefits depend on fit between technology characteristics and organizational
context. AI adoption yields greater financialization effects when
firms possess resources for effective implementation (large firms),
operate in environments aligned with AI capabilities (digital industries),
and face market conditions that intensify innovation pressures and
returns (competitive markets).
Practically, these results imply that the financial implications of AI
adoption should be evaluated with attention to firm and industry
context. Large firms in digitally intensive, competitive sectors are most
likely to experience substantial AI-driven increases in financial asset
holdings. Smaller firms in traditional, less competitive industries may
see minimal financialization effects from AI adoption, suggesting either
that AI implementation is less successful in such contexts or that any
benefits are deployed differently. Policymakers and managers should
recognize these differential impacts when designing AI promotion policies
or corporate AI strategies, tailoring approaches to specific organizational
and market contexts rather than applying one-size-fits-all
frameworks.
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
5. Conclusion
5.1. Summary of key findings
This study provides comprehensive empirical evidence on how
artificial intelligence adoption influences corporate financial asset
allocation decisions. Using panel data of Chinese listed firms with
30,070 observations covering 2010 to 2023, we establish several key
findings that advance understanding of the AI-financialization nexus.
First, we find robust evidence that AI adoption significantly increases
corporate financial asset holdings. This positive relationship persists
across multiple model specifications, alternative measures, and rigorous
endogeneity tests including instrumental variable estimation, propensity
score matching, and Heckman selection models. The economic
magnitude is substantial: AI adoption explains meaningful variation in
financial asset ratios beyond traditional determinants, suggesting that
technological innovation has become an important driver of corporate
financial strategies.
Second, we identify and empirically validate two competing mediating
mechanisms through which AI influences financialization. AI
adoption enhances firm profitability by improving operational efficiency,
decision quality, and competitive positioning, generating surplus
internal funds that flow into financial asset accumulation. This profitability
channel accounts for approximately 14 % of the total AI effect.
Simultaneously, AI adoption alleviates financing constraints by
improving firm performance signals, enhancing creditworthiness, and
increasing investor confidence, which affects financial asset holdings
through improved financial capacity. This financing constraint channel
contributes approximately 5 % of the total effect. The dominance of the
profitability mechanism over the financing constraint mechanism explains
the net positive impact of AI on financialization, supporting our
theoretical framework that surplus generation outweighs reduced precautionary
motives in determining financial asset strategies.
Third, we demonstrate that AI’s impact on financialization is highly
context-dependent, contingent on complementary capabilities and
environmental conditions at multiple levels. At the firm level, organizations
with stronger digital transformation foundations experience
significantly amplified AI effects, reflecting technological complementarities
where AI requires supporting digital infrastructure to deliver
maximum value. At the managerial level, top management teams with
greater technological cognition more effectively leverage AI investments,
resulting in stronger financialization impacts through better
implementation and strategic deployment of AI-generated resources. At
the regional level, superior digital infrastructure dramatically enhances
AI’s effectiveness, with the interaction magnitude suggesting that
environmental conditions may be particularly powerful enablers of AI
value realization.
Fourth, heterogeneity analyses reveal that AI-driven financialization
effects vary systematically across organizational and market contexts.
Large firms exhibit substantially stronger relationships between AI
adoption and financial asset holdings compared to smaller firms,
reflecting resource advantages, scale economies, and implementation
capabilities. Firms in digital economy industries show pronounced AI-
financialization relationships while traditional industry firms exhibit
minimal effects, indicating that technological alignment and existing
digital capabilities shape AI’s financial implications. Companies operating
in competitive markets demonstrate stronger AI effects than those
in less competitive environments, suggesting that competitive pressure
intensifies both AI deployment urgency and the strategic value of AI-
generated financial flexibility.
Collectively, these findings paint a nuanced picture of how emerging
technologies reshape corporate finance. AI adoption is neither uniformly
beneficial nor operates through simple direct pathways. Rather, its influence
on financial asset allocation emerges through multiple mechanisms,
depends critically on complementary organizational and
environmental factors, and varies substantially across firm and industry
17
X. Deng and C. Qin contexts. This complexity underscores the importance of moving beyond
simplistic technology adoption models toward richer frameworks
recognizing contingencies and complementarities.
5.2. Theoretical implications
This research makes several important theoretical contributions that
advance multiple literature streams. First, we extend the resource-based
view (RBV) by demonstrating that AI capabilities function as strategic
resources with implications beyond operational performance to include
financial strategy outcomes. While traditional RBV applications focus on
how valuable, rare, and inimitable resources generate competitive advantages,
we show that these advantages manifest not only in market
performance but also in financial asset allocation decisions. AI capabilities
represent knowledge-based resources that enhance organizational
information processing, decision-making efficiency, and adaptive
capacity. Our findings that AI’s value depends on complementary resources
including digital infrastructure, managerial cognition, and
regional ecosystems directly support and extend RBV’s emphasis on
resource complementarities and bundles. This integration of RBV with
corporate finance contributes to both fields by revealing how strategic
resources shape financial structures beyond traditional capital structure
considerations.
Second, we contribute to corporate finance theory by identifying
technological innovation as a novel determinant of financial asset
accumulation, expanding beyond conventional drivers emphasized in
existing literature. Prior research focuses primarily on declining investment
opportunities in real sectors (Demir, 2009), financing frictions,
and agency problems (Jensen, 1986) as explanations for corporate
financialization. We introduce AI adoption as an additional mechanism
operating through distinct pathways. Our dual-mediation framework
reconciles and integrates two foundational finance theories: free cash
flow theory and pecking order theory. AI generates surplus cash flows
consistent with the view that firms may allocate to financial investments
when agency problems or limited growth opportunities constrain productive
deployment. Simultaneously, AI alleviates information asymmetries
and financing constraints, affecting financial asset decisions
through improved external financing access. By demonstrating that both
mechanisms operate concurrently with differential magnitudes, we
provide a more complete theoretical account of how technology-driven
financial performance improvements translate into asset allocation
outcomes.
Third, our study advances technology management and innovation
literature by empirically validating contingency perspectives on AI
value realization. We provide evidence supporting theories of technological
complementarity and general-purpose technology diffusion in
the specific context of AI adoption. The significant three-level moderating
effects across firm digital foundations, managerial cognition, and
regional infrastructure demonstrate that AI benefits emerge only when
embedded in supportive organizational and environmental contexts.
This finding helps explain persistent productivity paradoxes and heterogeneous
AI returns documented in prior research: variation in complementary
investments and contextual conditions generates differential
outcomes even when firms nominally adopt similar AI technologies. Our
framework integrating internal capabilities, leadership characteristics,
and external infrastructure provides a template for future research
examining conditions under which emerging technologies deliver
promised benefits.
Fourth, we contribute methodologically by employing a comprehensive
empirical approach addressing multiple endogeneity concerns
and testing complex mediation and moderation relationships simultaneously.
Our triangulation across instrumental variables, propensity
score matching, and selection models provides robust causal evidence
strengthening confidence in findings. The formal mediation tests with
Sobel statistics and bootstrap confidence intervals offer rigorous validation
of theoretical mechanisms. The multi-level moderation analyses
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
demonstrate how to examine contingencies operating at different
organizational levels within a unified framework. This methodological
rigor sets standards for future empirical research on technology-finance
relationships.
Finally, our findings speak to emerging debates about financialization
consequences in the context of technological change. While extensive
literature debates whether corporate financialization represents
efficient capital allocation or problematic diversion from productive
investment (Orhangazi, 2008), we show that technological innovation
introduces additional complexity. AI-driven financialization may differ
fundamentally from financialization driven by declining real sector
opportunities or short-term financial market pressures. When financialization
results from technology-enhanced profitability generating
legitimate surplus resources, normative assessments may differ from
cases where financialization reflects rent-seeking or strategic stagnation.
Our research suggests that the welfare implications of financialization
cannot be evaluated independently of its underlying drivers, opening
avenues for future theoretical development distinguishing between
productive and unproductive forms of financial asset accumulation.
5.3. Managerial implications
Our findings offer actionable insights for multiple stakeholder groups
including corporate managers, investors, and policymakers, with implications
for strategic decision-making, investment evaluation, and
policy design.
Implications for Corporate Managers. Executives should recognize AI
adoption as a strategic initiative with significant financial implications
extending beyond operational improvements. Our evidence demonstrates
that AI investments generate not only efficiency gains and
competitive advantages but also reshape corporate financial profiles by
increasing financial asset holdings. Managers should therefore integrate
AI strategy with financial planning, anticipating that successful AI
implementation will generate surplus resources requiring strategic
allocation decisions. Rather than viewing AI purely as an operational
technology, leadership should understand its role in enhancing financial
flexibility and resource availability.
However, managers must also recognize that capturing AI’s full
financial benefits requires complementary investments and capabilities.
Organizations should assess and strengthen their digital transformation
foundations before or concurrent with AI adoption, ensuring adequate
data infrastructure, information systems, and digital skill bases exist to
support AI implementation. Piecemeal AI investments without supporting
digital capabilities are unlikely to yield maximum returns.
Additionally, firms should invest in developing technological cognition
at the leadership level through executive education, strategic hires
bringing technology expertise to top management teams, and cultivation
of digital literacy across the organization. Our findings suggest that
technology-oriented leadership significantly amplifies AI’s financial
impacts, making human capital development in technological domains a
high-priority complement to AI technology investments.
Furthermore, managers should carefully evaluate organizational and
environmental contexts when formulating AI strategies. Large firms,
those in digital economy sectors, and companies facing competitive
pressure appear particularly well-positioned to benefit financially from
AI adoption. Smaller firms in traditional industries may need to adjust
expectations, pursue focused AI applications aligned with specific capabilities,
or consider collaborative approaches pooling resources with
partners to overcome scale and capability disadvantages. Location decisions
should also consider regional digital infrastructure quality, as our
evidence suggests environmental factors substantially moderate AI
benefits. Firms in regions with limited digital infrastructure may need to
invest more heavily in self-sufficient technological capabilities or
engage with policymakers to improve local conditions.
Implications for Investors and Financial Analysts. Our findings provide
investors with new frameworks for evaluating corporate AI
18
X. Deng and C. Qin initiatives and their financial implications. Rather than viewing AI
adoption as a pure cost or speculative investment, investors should
recognize that AI can materially affect firms’ financial asset positions
and overall financial health through profitability improvements and
financing constraint alleviation. When assessing firms’ AI strategies,
investors should examine not just the technology investments themselves
but also the complementary capabilities and contextual factors
determining likely success. Firms with strong digital foundations, technologically
sophisticated management, and operations in digitally
advanced regions merit higher valuations for AI initiatives due to
greater probability of successful implementation and financial value
creation.
Additionally, investors should consider AI adoption patterns when
evaluating financial asset holdings. Increases in financial assets among
AI-adopting firms may reflect prudent management of technology-
generated surpluses rather than concerning over-financialization.
Context matters: AI-driven financial asset accumulation in firms with
strong growth prospects and continued innovation investment likely
differs from financially motivated asset accumulation by stagnant firms
avoiding productive investment. Investors should thus assess whether
financial asset increases accompany or substitute for innovation and real
investment when interpreting corporate strategies.
Implications for Policymakers. Government officials and regulators
should view digital infrastructure as critical public goods warranting
substantial investment. Our findings demonstrate that regional digital
infrastructure dramatically amplifies firm-level AI returns, suggesting
that public infrastructure provision generates significant positive externalities
for private sector innovation and performance. Policies
should prioritize expanding broadband access, supporting data center
development, promoting 5G network deployment, and fostering digital
technology service ecosystems. These investments create enabling environments
allowing firms to maximize AI adoption benefits, ultimately
supporting economic growth, productivity improvements, and competitive
advantages.
Beyond infrastructure, policymakers should consider targeted support
for AI adoption, particularly for firms facing resource constraints or
operating in less digitally intensive sectors. Subsidies, tax incentives,
low-cost financing, and technical assistance programs could help smaller
firms and traditional industry companies overcome barriers to AI
implementation, reducing disparities in technology access and benefits.
However, such support should be coupled with requirements or incentives
for complementary investments in digital foundations and
human capital development, ensuring that subsidized AI adoption occurs
in contexts supporting successful implementation.
Educational and workforce development policies should emphasize
technological literacy and digital skills at all levels, from basic digital
competence in the general workforce to advanced technical capabilities
among specialists and strategic technology understanding among business
leaders. Our finding that managerial technological cognition
significantly moderates AI benefits underscores the importance of executive
education programs, university curricula emphasizing technology
management, and professional development opportunities helping
current leaders develop digital fluency. Broader workforce digital skill
development ensures adequate talent supply supporting widespread AI
adoption across industries.
Finally, policymakers should monitor AI-driven financialization
patterns to ensure they reflect productive resource allocation rather than
problematic diversion from real economic activities. While our evidence
suggests AI-driven financial asset accumulation stems from legitimate
surplus generation, regulators should remain vigilant for excessive
financialization that might undermine long-term productive investment,
innovation capacity, or employment. Balanced policies encouraging AI
adoption while maintaining incentives for continued real sector investment
and innovation can help optimize economic outcomes from
technological transformation.
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
5.4. Limitations and future research directions
Despite its contributions, this study has important limitations that
suggest avenues for future research. First, measurement and methodological
challenges constrain our ability to draw definitive conclusions.
Our AI adoption proxies, while grounded in objective financial data,
capture AI-related capital expenditures rather than actual deployment
intensity, utilization patterns, or value generation from AI systems.
Firms may purchase AI equipment or software without effectively
implementing or integrating it into operations, introducing measurement
error that likely attenuates estimated effects toward zero, implying
our findings may understate true relationships. Similarly, our dependent
variable measuring financial assets as a proportion of total assets aggregates
diverse asset types including operational cash, short-term investments,
and longer-term financial holdings. This broad definition
may conflate precautionary liquidity management with strategic
financial investment, limiting our ability to distinguish between
different motives for financial asset accumulation.
Despite our multiple robustness checks including instrumental variables,
propensity score matching, and Heckman selection models
addressing different endogeneity sources, causal identification challenges
persist. Reverse causality remains plausible: financially strong
firms with substantial financial assets may possess greater capacity to
undertake expensive AI investments, creating feedback loops our models
cannot fully disentangle. Omitted variables such as unobserved managerial
quality, organizational culture, or strategic orientation may
simultaneously influence AI adoption decisions and financial asset
strategies.
Future research should address these limitations through several
approaches. Studies should leverage richer firm-level data on AI projects,
AI talent composition, AI-generated outputs, or AI system utilization
metrics to measure adoption more accurately. Financial assets
should be disaggregated into subcategories such as cash and equivalents,
trading securities, available-for-sale investments, and equity stakes in
other firms, examining whether AI adoption affects these components
differentially. Research should exploit quasi-natural experiments such
as exogenous shocks to AI adoption costs, regional AI policy variations,
or technological breakthroughs enabling difference-in-differences or
regression discontinuity designs that strengthen causal inference.
Mixed-methods approaches combining econometric analysis with
qualitative case evidence would provide more comprehensive understanding
of how AI causally affects financial strategies.
Future research should conduct cross-country comparative studies
examining whether our findings replicate in diverse institutional contexts.
Multi-country samples could test whether the AI-financialization
relationship is universal or context-specific, identifying institutional
factors that amplify or dampen effects. Country-specific studies in
developed economies, other emerging markets, or frontier markets
would reveal how economic development levels, financial market sophistication,
and regulatory frameworks shape AI’s financial implications.
Longer time horizons using extended panels or longitudinal
tracking of cohorts over decades could illuminate dynamic patterns and
long-term consequences. Research should examine downstream outcomes
including how AI-adopting firms with higher financial assets
subsequently perform on innovation output, R&D investment, employment
growth, productivity improvements, and long-term market value
compared to AI adopters maintaining lower financial asset ratios. Such
analyses would reveal whether AI-driven financialization supports or
hinders firms’ real economic contributions.
Finally, our study identifies that substantial portions of AI’s total
effect on financialization operate through unmeasured mechanisms
beyond profitability and financing constraints. Future research should
investigate additional mediating pathways including AI’s effects on risk
management capabilities, information processing efficiency, organizational
learning, strategic flexibility, and competitive positioning. Qualitative
research exploring managers’ decision-making processes
19
X. Deng and C. Qin regarding AI-generated resources could uncover mechanisms not easily
captured in quantitative models. Attention to behavioral factors, organizational
routines, and institutional pressures shaping financial asset
allocation decisions would enrich understanding of the AI-
financialization relationship’s microfoundations.
In conclusion, while this study advances knowledge significantly,
substantial opportunities remain for deeper exploration of how
emerging technologies reshape corporate finance. Future research
addressing these limitations through improved measurement, stronger
causal designs, cross-context comparisons, long-term analyses, and
investigation of additional mechanisms will further illuminate the
complex interplay between technological innovation and financial
strategy in modern corporations.
Acknowledgement
This study was supported by the Fundamental Research Funds for the
Central Universities (Grant No. FRF-TP-22-064A1)
Data availability
Data will be made available on request.
References
Babina, T., Fedyk, A., He, A., & Hodson, J. (2024). Artificial intelligence, firm growth,
and product innovation. Journal of Financial Economics, 151, Article 103745.
Bahoo, S., Cucculelli, M., & Qamar, D. (2023). Artificial intelligence and corporate
innovation: A review and research agenda. Technological Forecasting and Social
Change, 188, Article 122264.
Bates, T. W., Kahle, K. M., & Stulz, R. M. (2009). Why do US firms hold so much more
cash than they used to? The Journal of Finance, 64(5), 1985–2021.
Bo, L., Li, H., Zhang, S., & Tang, R. (2025). Digital transformation and financing
constraints: Evidence from Chinese manufacturing multinational enterprises. Digital
Economy and Sustainable Development, 3(1), 6.
Chen, D., Esperança, J. P., & Wang, S. (2022). The impact of artificial intelligence on firm
performance: An application of the resource-based view to e-commerce firms.
Frontiers in Psychology, 13, Article 884830.
Chen, P., Chu, Z., & Zhao, M. (2024). The road to corporate sustainability: The
importance of artificial intelligence. Technology in Society, 76, Article 102440.
Dai, J. (2025). Technology-Finance Integration Pilot Policy and the Value of Technology-
Based SMEs: The Moderating Role of Corporate Governance Structure. The Singapore
Economic Review. Early View.
Dai, J., Zhou, B., & Meng, W. (2025). The impact of digitization on environmental
sustainability: New insights from G20 nations. Journal of Environmental Management,
394, 127225.
International Review of Financial Analysis 110 (2026) 104906
Demir, F. (2009). Financial liberalization, private investment and portfolio choice:
Financialization of real sectors in emerging markets. Journal of Development
Economics, 88(2), 314–324.
Dong, Z., Xin, Z., Liu, D., & Yu, F. (2024). The impact of artificial intelligence application
on company environmental investment in Chinese manufacturing companies.
International Review of Financial Analysis, 95, Article 103403.
Durongkadej, I., Hu, W., & Wang, H. E. (2024). How artificial intelligence incidents affect
banks and financial services firms? A study of five firms. Finance Research Letters, 70,
Article 106279.
Hadlock, C. J., & Pierce, J. R. (2010). New evidence on measuring financial constraints:
Moving beyond the KZ index. The Review of Financial Studies, 23(5), 1909–1940.
Li, J., Wu, T., Hu, B., Pan, D., & Zhou, Y. (2025). Artificial intelligence and corporate ESG
performance. International Review of Financial Analysis, 102, Article 104036.
Li, Y., Zhong, H., & Tong, Q. (2024). Artificial intelligence, dynamic capabilities, and
corporate financial asset allocation. International Review of Financial Analysis, 96,
Article 103773.
Lui, A. K., Lee, M. C., & Ngai, E. W. (2022). Impact of artificial intelligence investment on
firm value. Annals of Operations Research, 308(1), 373–388.
Mishra, S., Ewing, M. T., & Cooper, H. B. (2022). Artificial intelligence focus and firm
performance. Journal of the Academy of Marketing Science, 50(6), 1176–1197.
Orhangazi, ¨
O. (2008). Financialisation and capital accumulation in the non-financial
corporate sector: A theoretical and empirical investigation on the US economy:
1973–2003. Cambridge Journal of Economics, 32(6), 863–886.
Qu, G., & Jing, H. (2025). Is new technology always good? Artificial intelligence and
corporate tax avoidance: Evidence from China. International Review of Economics and
Finance, 98, Article 103949.
Teece, D. J. (2007). Explicating dynamic capabilities: The nature and microfoundations
of (sustainable) enterprise performance. Strategic Management Journal, 28(13),
1319–1350.
Wang, Z., & Liu, H. (2025). Can intelligent transformation enhance corporate green
innovation performance? Finance Research Letters, 107426.
Xin, W. (2025). The impact of corporate artificial intelligence on financial risk: Evidence
from China. Finance Research Letters, 107435.
Xu, X., & Xuan, C. (2021). A study on the motivation of financialization in emerging
markets: The case of Chinese nonfinancial corporations. International Review of
Economics and Finance, 72, 606–623.
Yang, X. (2025). AI competition and firm value: Evidence from DeepSeek’s disruption.
Finance Research Letters, 107447.
Zhang, C., & Yang, J. (2024). Artificial intelligence and corporate ESG performance.
International Review of Economics and Finance, 96, Article 103713.
Zhang, J., & Piao, M. (2025). The impact of artificial intelligence on the Financialization
of enterprises: Research on the mediating effects based on Enterprise labor
productivity. International Review of Economics and Finance, 104322.
Zhong, K., & Song, L. (2025). Artificial intelligence adoption and corporate green
innovation capability. Finance Research Letters, 72, Article 106480.
Zhou, B., Gao, K., Ning, J., Zhang, A., & Dai, J. (2024). Does Air Pollution Change the
Business Strategy for Investment? A Strategic Role of National Governance. Finance
Research Letters, 63, 105302.
Zhou, X., Li, G., Wang, Q., Li, Y., & Zhou, D. (2025). Artificial intelligence, corporate
information governance and ESG performance: Quasi-experimental evidence from
China. International Review of Financial Analysis, 102, Article 104087.
20
